<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89110-0030 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-10-89.f2.A1029</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 6 / Tuesday, January 10, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 61 and 763</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[AD-FRL-OPTS-3469-4]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Asbestos NESHAP Revision, Including Disposal of Asbestos ContainingMaterials Removed From Schools</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rule revision and opportunity for publichearing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>These proposed amendments to the asbestos National EmissionStandard for Hazardous Air Pollutants (NESHAP) require control device andfugitive emission monitoring, recordkeeping, and reporting for asbestosmilling, manufacturing, and fabricating operations. For planned demolitionsand renovations, the notification requirements are revised, and safetyis added as a reason for exemption from the use of wet removal methods.Recordkeeping is required for asbestos waste disposal. Clarifying revisionsare made to several definitions and provisions.The existing standard and the proposed amendments implement section 112of the Clean Air Act (CAA) and are based on the Administrator's determinationthat asbestos presents a significant risk to human health as a result ofair emissions from one or more source categories and is therefore a hazardousair pollutant (see 36 FR 3031 (March 31, 1971)). The standard proposedtoday amends the asbestos NESHAP to enhance enforcement and promote compliancewith the current standard without altering the stringency of existing controls.These regulations also would implement, in part, section 203(h) of theAsbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (AHERA) to the extent they applyto disposal of asbestos removed from school buildings.A public hearing will be held, if requested, to provide interested personswith an opportunity for oral presentation of data or views concerning theproposed amendments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2><T3>Comments. </T3>Comments must be received on or before March 7, 1989.<T3>Public Hearing. </T3>If anyone contacts EPA requesting to speak ata public hearing by January 31, 1989, a public hearing will be held onFebruary 8, 1989 beginning at 10:00 a.m. Persons interested in attendingthe hearing should call Ms. Ann Eleanor at telephone no. 919-541-5578 toverify that a hearing will occur.<T3>Request to Speak at Hearing. </T3>Persons wishing to present oral testimonymust contact EPA by January 31, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2><T3>Comments. </T3>Comments should be submitted (in duplicate if possible)to: Central Docket Section (LE-131), South Conference Center, Room 4, Attention:Docket No. A-88-28, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M StreetSW., Washington, DC 20460.<T3>Public Hearing. </T3>If anyone contacts EPA requestng a public hearing,the hearing will be held at the EPA Office of Administration Auditorium,Research Triangle Park, North Carolina. Persons who want to present oraltestimony should notify Ms. Ann Eleanor, Standards Development Branch (MD-13),U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina27711, telephone no. 919-541-5578. Persons interested in attending thehearing should call Ms. Ann Eleanor to verify that a hearing will occur.<T3>Docket. </T3>Docket No. A-88-28, containing supporting informationused in developing the proposed standards revisions, is available for publicinspection and copying between 8:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m., Monday throughFriday, at EPA's Central Docket Section, South Conference Center, Room4, West Tower Lobby, Gallery 1, Waterside Mall, 401 M Street SW., Washington,DC 20460. A reasonable fee may be charged for copying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>For information concerning thepolicy aspects of the proposed standard revisions, contact Mr. Sims Roy,Standards Development Branch, Emission Standards Division (MD-13), U.S.Environmental Protection Agency, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina27711, telephone no. 919-541-5263. For information concerning technicalaspects, contact Mr. Bruce Moore, Industrial Studies Branch, telephoneno. 919-541-5460, at the same address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction</ITAG>Section 112(a)(1) of the CAA defines a ``hazardous air pollutant'' as onethat the Administrator judges ``causes or contributes to air pollutionwhich may reasonably be anticipated to result in an increase in mortalityor an increase in serious irreversible, or incapacitating reversible illness.''Section 112(b)(1)(A) of the CAA requires the Administrator to publish alist that includes each hazardous air pollutant for which he intends toestablish an emission standard under this section. Asbestos was listedas a hazardous air pollutant under section 112 on March 31, 1971 (36 FR3031).Initial standards controlling milling, manufacturing, demolition, spraying,and roadway sources of asbestos emissions were promulgated on April 6,1973 (38 FR 8820). These standards were based on the 1970 conclusion bythe National Academy of Science (NAS) that asbestos emissions from majormanmade sources should be minimized. On October 14, 1975, the demolitionstandards were revised to place additional requirements on demolitionsordered by State or local governments besides notification requirementsalready in effect, and the standard was expanded to cover renovation activities,use of asbestos in friable insulation, and waste disposal (40 FR 48299).Work practices covering emissions from demolition and renovation were amendedon June 19, 1978 (43 FR 26372), and were repromulgated on April 5, 1984(49 FR 13658), to reinstate work practice and equipment controls held notto be emission standards by the Supreme Court in its decision in <T3>Adamo Wrecking Company v. United States, </T3>434 U.S. 275 (1978).The 1977 amendments to the CAA authorize work practice standards when itis not feasible to prescribe an emission standard. Such an instance occurs,for example, when a pollutant cannot be emitted through a conveyance designedand constructed to emit or capture such a pollutant or when a measurementmethodology is not available.A general review of the current asbestos NESHAP was undertaken to evaluatethe consistency of the existing standard with current EPA policies forNESHAP regulatory development, the availability of improved emission controls,the need to improve compliance, and the integration of the NESHAP withother regulatory requirements. The EPA determined that, when complied with,the asbestos NESHAP is effective in reducing emissions and protecting thepublic health. However, EPA also concluded that many demolition and renovationsources do not comply with the removal and waste disposal provisions ofthe current standard, and that some additional work practices should berequired. Also, there is a need for an explicit requirement to monitorair pollution control devices at milling, manufacturing, and fabricatingsources to ensure their proper operation.A risk-based approach was also considered in the review of the currentasbestos NESHAP. However, questions regarding how EPA weighs a range ofhealth, risk, and other factors in establishing an ample margin of safetyfor NESHAPs were raised in the District of Columbia Circuit Court decisionin the <T3>Natural Resources Defense Council v. EPA, </T3>824 F. 2d 1146 (D.C.Cir. 1987), ``vinyl chloride case.'' In the vinyl chloride decision, thecourt prescribed a two-step process under which the Administrator mustfirst determine an acceptable risk level based on consideration of healthand risk factors alone, and then determine the level at which to set thestandard in order to provide an ample margin of safety, which can includeconsideration of costs, feasibility, and other relevant factors. In connectionwith regulation of some sources of benzene, the Agency has recently publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(43 FR 28496) four proposed approaches for implementingthe vinyl chloride decision. Public comment on these approaches is beingsought, and these comments will be reviewed before the Administrator makesa decision regarding which approach to use to develop NESHAP standards.Until the NESHAP policy is clarified, EPA cannot complete its work on risk-basedproposals for revision of the asbestos NESHAP. At this time, the Agencyis merely revising the portions of the standard that are not risk-basedto clarify their intent and to facilitate their enforcement.Today's notice proposes to amend the NESHAP to enhance enforcement andimprove compliance by (1) permitting the use of percent by area as an expressionfor the asbestos content of bulk materials; (2) adding monitoring and recordkeepingprovisions for asbestos milling, manufacturing, and fabricating operations;(3) revising notification requirements for demolitions and renovations;(4) adding recordkeeping and reporting provisions for waste disposal; and(5) making other revisions that clarify the rule and its intent and implementenforcement determinations previously made. None of the proposed amendmentsaffects the stringency of controls; accordingly, the amendments are notaffected by the vinyl chloride decision.The EPA may issue a second proposal at a later date that would includea review of the stringency of controls, and propose possible changes tothe stringency of controls. Such a proposal would follow the ``acceptablerisk'' and ``ample margin of safety'' requirements of the vinyl chloridedecision.These rules, to the extent they apply to disposal of asbestos from schools,are also being issued under authority of AHERA. AHERA enacted Title II(sections 201 thru 214) of the Toxic Substances Control Act (TSCA), codifiedat 15 U.S.C. 2641 thru 2654.Section 203 of TSCA requires EPA to promulgate regulations governing asbestos-containingmaterial in schools. The EPA is to issue several specific kinds of rules,including inspection rules, rules for determining appropriate actions totake in response to potential asbestos hazards and rules to require implementationof management plans for asbestos.On October 17, 1987, EPA issued most of the regulations mandated by section203 (52 FR 41826, October 30, 1987). The regulations are codified at 40CFR Part 763, Subpart E. However, the Agency did not promulgate rules forasbestos waste disposal required under section 203(h). Failure to promulgatethe disposal rules resulted from a decision EPA made when the section 203rules were proposed in April 1987 (52 FR 15820). The EPA had reasoned that,since the asbestos NESHAP covers wastes from all buildings including schools,the section 203(h) disposal rules should be included in the NESHAP. Atthe time, NESHAP revisions were expected to be proposed in the summer of1987. Due to the vinyl chloride decision, however, the NESHAP revisionswere not proposed as expected.The EPA continues to believe that it is inappropriate to have separateregulations for disposal of asbestos from schools and from other buildings.However, because of the uncertainty caused by the vinyl chloride opinion,EPA may issue final regulations under section 203(h) applicable only todisposal of asbestos from schools and may incorporate such regulationsinto 40 CFR Part 763, basing them on this proposal.The standard under which these regulations are to be issued under TSCATitle II is provided by section 203(a), which requires that any regulationpromulgated under section 203 ``must protect human health and the environment.''The EPA believes that these regulations will protect human health and theenvironment under the section 203(a) standard because they will facilitateenforcement of existing regulations governing disposal of asbestos fromschools, as noted in this preamble. The EPA, however, does not believethat these regulations necessarily complete its obligation under section203(h). If at a later date risk-based revisions to the NESHAP are issued,the remainder of the Agency's obligation under section 203(h) will be fulfilled.This preamble first provides background information in the form of a briefdescription of the health effects associated with exposure to asbestosand a summary of the widespread Federal authority for regulating asbestos.The preamble then summarizes the proposed amendments. Next, the environmental,health, energy, and economic impacts of the proposed amendments are summarized.The rationale is then provided for each decision made in selecting theproposed amendments. Also discussed are the impacts of the recordkeepingand reporting requirements. Administrative considerations, including ExecutiveOrder 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) are described at theend of the preamble. The preamble consists of the following:<ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Summary of Changes to Asbestos NESHAP</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Milling, Manufacturing, and Fabricating Sources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Demolition and Renovation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Waste Disposal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Summary of Environmental, Energy, and Economic Impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Rationale</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Demolition and Renovation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Milling, Manufacturing, and Fabricating</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Waste Disposal</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Spraying</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Roadways</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">_Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Impacts of Reporting Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Public Hearing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Docket</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">andbullet; Miscellaneous.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Diseases associated with asbestos exposure include asbestosis, mesothelioma,cancer of the lung, and cancer of the gastrointestinal tract. Asbestosisis a pulmonary fibrosis caused by the accumulation of asbestos fibers inthe lungs and is usually associated with occupational exposure to asbestosconcentrations much higher than those that normally occur in outdoor air.Mesothelioma is a cancer of the pleura or the peritoneum. Mesotheliomasare rarely curable, and death usually results within a year of diagnosis.Asbestos-induced lung cancer usually has a latency period of more than20 years, and few cases of lung cancer are curable. A number of epidemiologicstudies of asbestos workers have indicated increases in esophageal, stomach,colorectal, kidney, laryngeal, pharyngeal, and buccal-cavity cancers, thoughat a smaller magnitude of increased cancer risk than lung cancer and mesothelioma.The health aspects of asbestos are discussed in the Health Effects Documentfor asbestos, which is available from the EPA Library (MD-35), ResearchTriangle Park, North Carolina 27711. Please refer to <T3>Airborne Asbestos Health Assessment Update </T3>(EPA 600/8-84/003f).In evaluating the coverage and effectiveness of the existing asbestos standardsunder section 112, it is important to recognize the widespread use of Federalauthority to control asbestos use and exposure. Within, EPA, regulationsfor asbestos have been issued under the CAA, TSCA, the Resource Conservationand Recovery Act (RCRA), the Clean Water Act (CWA), the Federal Water PollutionControl Act (FWPCA), and the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation,and Liability Act (CERCLA). Under the authority of TSCA, EPA has promulgatedregulations requiring inspection for asbestos in schools, and has publishedregulations to require State/local governments not covered under FederalOccupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) requirements for asbestosabatement projects to comply with the Federal OSHA requirements. UnderAHERA, EPA has promulgated regulations to protect public health and theenvironment from asbestos in school buildings. Additionally, EPA, underthe authority of TSCA, has proposed to ban certain asbestos products andphase out other such products (51 FR 3738, January 29, 1986). Guidelinesfor proper disposal of asbestos waste have been published recently by EPA.Under CERCLA, EPA has developed a Reportable Quantity (RQ) of one (1) poundfor asbestos waste. The EPA also has set asbestos effluent standards forsome source categories (40 CFR 427) and developed water quality criteria(45 FR 79326) for asbestos.Outside of EPA, the Department of Labor's OSHA and Mine Safety and HealthAdministration (MSHA) control workplace asbestos exposure levels. The OSHAhas promulgated a revised workplace standard that reduces the allowableworkplace exposure level as an 8-hour time-weighted-average (TWA) from2.0 fibers per cubic centimeter (f/cc) to 0.2 f/cc (29 CFR 1910.1001 and29 CFR 1926.58). The OSHA regulations protect workers (the NESHAP protectspublic health principally) and require certain actions, such as the useof wetting techniques, to prevent the workplace concentrations from reachingthe permissible exposure limit of 0.2 f/cc. Asbestos use in some consumerproducts is regulated by the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC).The U.S. Department of Transportation (DOT) has regulations covering thetransportation of asbestos and asbestos products. Recently, DOT promulgatedregulations in compliance with the Superfund Amendments and ReauthorizationAct (SARA) of 1986 that cover the transportation of asbestos-containingwaste material (51 FR 42174, November 21, 1986). The effective date ofthese regulations was subsequently delayed to July 1, 1987.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Changes to Asbestos NESHAP</ITAG>GeneralThe regulation is reorganized by combining applicability, notificationrequirements, and procedures for asbestos emission control into a singlestandard for demolition and renovation. It requires milling, manufacturing,and fabricating operations to monitor visible emissions daily, inspectair cleaning devices weekly, and keep records. The regulation also requiresrecordkeeping and reporting for waste disposal activities.In general, compliance with the NESHAP approaches 100 percent for all operationsexcept demolition and renovation, including disposal of demolition andrenovation waste, where it is estimated to be about 50 percent for demolitionand about 80 percent for renovation. As a result of this noncompliance,significant asbestos emissions occur, with those from the disposal of demolitionwaste greatly exceeding other emissions, including those from asbestosmilling, manufacturing, and fabricating. Several amendments are proposedto improve compliance with and enforceability of the NESHAP and to helpensure proper operation and maintenance of control equipment.Milling, Manufacturing, and Fabricating SourcesThis proposal requires asbestos milling, manufacturing, and fabricatingsources to perform daily monitoring for visible emissions and weekly inspectionof air cleaning devices.Demolition and RenovationThis proposal clarifies the definition of demolition to recognize thatintentional burning is a method of demolition. An additional notificationprovision requires owners or operators to contact EPA in advance of theactual start date if the demolition or renovation will begin on a dateother than the one specified in the original notification. The requirementthat the on-site supervisor at asbestos removals be trained in proceduresfor removal and handling of asbestos-containing material in accordancewith the NESHAP is also a new provision in the regulation.Waste DisposalAn amendment is proposed to make the waste disposal site operator responsiblefor complying with the waste disposal site provisions. Under the currentNESHAP, the waste generator is responsible for selecting a disposal sitethat meets the waste disposal requirements of the NESHAP. A new requirementis added for keeping records that show the location and quantity of asbestoswaste disposed of at disposal sites and for noting this information onthe deed to property when the site becomes inactive.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Environmental, Energy, and Economic Impacts</ITAG>The environmental, energy, and economic impacts of the proposed amendmentsfor demolition and renovation, including waste disposal, were estimatedfrom two baselines. One is full compliance with the NESHAP, and the otheris current use of engineering controls and work practices. Enforcementexperience indicates that many asbestos removal operations related to demolitionand the subsequent waste disposal operations related to both demolitionand renovation are performed out of compliance with the NESHAP. The lackof compliance with the NESHAP removal provisions leads to the improperdisposal of some waste, especially demolition waste, with the result thatemissions from the disposal of demolition waste greatly exceed other emissions,including process emissions from milling, manufacturing, and fabricating.Liability and other considerations generally lead the owners of buildingsbeing renovated to follow or even exceed the requirements of the NESHAP.Thus, the baseline for demolition and renovation is current use of workpractices rather than full compliance. At asbestos milling, manufacturing,and fabricating facilities, the required air pollution control devicesare generally in place. Thus, for milling, manufacturing, and fabricating,full compliance with the NESHAP, including the waste disposal requirements,is assumed for the baseline.Impacts of the demolition and renovation amendments are based on estimatedannual emissions of asbestos. Emission estimates are the product of emissionsper unit of asbestos removed and disposed of and the average quantity ofasbestos removed and disposed of annually. The annual amount of asbestosremoved and waste generated was estimated using representative models ofasbestos-containing structures and projections of the average number ofdemolitions and renovations for an 83-year period (i.e., the time duringwhich all asbestos-containing structures are expected to be demolishedor renovated to remove asbestos). Impacts of the proposed amendments, includingthe waste disposal provisions, for milling, manufacturing, and fabricatingare based in part on information from confidential data submitted to theOffice of Pesticides and Toxic Substances (OPTS) under section 8(a) ofTSCA and on information obtained under section 114 of CAA.Little emission measurement data exist for asbestos sources. Thus, emissionswere estimated using engineering methods and numerous assumptions, whichresulted in substantial uncertainty. A detailed description of the approachesused to estimate emissions is found in ``Asbestos Emission Estimates forMilling, Manufacturing, Fabricating, Demolition, Renovation, and WasteDisposal,'' which is contained in Docket A-88-28. Estimated emissions fromasbestos removal activities associated with demolition and renovation assumingfull compliance are about 700 kg/yr. Estimated emissions from waste disposal,assuming full compliance with the NESHAP by all sources, are about 600kg/yr. Estimated process emissions under the current NESHAP at full compliancefor milling, manufacturing, and fabricating are approximately 7,400 kg/yr.As has been stated previously, enforcement experience indicates that asignificant amount of asbestos material is handled out of compliance withsome of the provisions of the NESHAP. An estimated 50 percent of asbestosremoval operations related to demolition and renovation are performed withoutEPA notification, implying that many asbestos removals and the subsequentwaste disposal operations are performed out of compliance with the NESHAP.However, without precise information on the relationship between notificationsand level of compliance, the actual degree of compliance with the NESHAPis uncertain. The amendments being proposed today are intended to increasethe level of compliance with the demolition and renovation provisions,thereby reducing emissions, yet the extent to which emissions would bereduced by the proposed amendments cannot be quantified precisely.The following estimates of nationwide emissions are based on current practices.Emissions for milling, manufacturing, and fabricating are the same as forfull compliance. Estimated emissions from demolition and renovation areapproximately 1,300 kg/yr. Estimated waste disposal emissions from allwaste are 227,000 kg/yr.The costs of the proposed amendments are expected to be small relativeto normal operating costs for these industries. The amendments are intendedto promote compliance and codify existing good practices. Small additionalcosts are associated with the recordkeeping and reporting requirementsof the amendments. Economic impacts of the alternatives included in thisproposal are expected to be minimal. Adverse impacts of the proposed amendmentson water, noise, and energy were considered. Due to the nature of the amendments,no significant adverse impacts on water, noise, or energy are anticipated.<ITAG tagnum="84">Rationale</ITAG>Demolition and RenovationSections 61.145 through 61.147 of the existing asbestos NESHAP requireremoval of friable asbestos materials prior to demolition and require controlsduring removals associated with demolition or renovation. Costs and benefitsattributable to the NESHAP for asbestos removal during renovation are difficultto establish because removal operations are also subject to the requirementsof existing State and OSHA regulations for occupational exposure. As notedearlier, EPA has promulgated regulations under the authority of AHERA thatcover asbestos removals at school buildings. Furthermore, many renovationsalready use controls exceeding those in the NESHAP because of the concernover occupant exposure once the renovation is completed and the buildingis returned to use. In demolition, however, occupant exposure is not typicallya factor so that asbestos removal is generally not as strictly controlledas it is in renovation. Thus, the potential for emissions is usually greaterin a demolition than in a renovation.The major provisions of the current demolition standard are the requirementfor removal (and control during removal) of friable asbestos material priorto demolition and the requirement for proper waste disposal. Because thesetwo provisions are tied intimately to one another (i.e., the waste disposalprovisions cover the waste generated by the removal requirement), the impactsrelated to asbestos removal and waste disposal must be considered togetherin evaluating amendments to the demolition standard.As explained above, the existing NESHAP was evaluated at two levels ofcompliance. It was evaluated at full compliance and, because enforcementexperience indicates substantial noncompliance, it also was evaluated basedon current practice. At full compliance, nationwide asbestos emissionsfrom removal and waste disposal under the current NESHAP would be an estimated1,100 kg/yr. The uncertainty associated with estimates of emissions isvery large.The extent to which asbestos is handled out of compliance with the NESHAPdemolition and renovation regulations is uncertain and depends on variousfactors. For example, because of OSHA and State and local regulations andpressures from other sources, including the general public, renovationsand waste from renovations may be well-controlled even if EPA is not notified.Removal emissions associated with renovation are small and do not constitutea significant fraction of the total emissions from removal and waste disposalcombined. Demolitions, however, are not affected by other regulations tothe extent that renovations are. Thus, the absence of a notification mayindicate that an asbestos-containing structure is demolished with the asbestosleft in place. However, asbestos emissions from the disposal of the demolitiondebris may be overstated because some of the waste might still be incidentallydeposited in a landfill and covered. Under the existing NESHAP, assuming50 percent compliance with the notification requirement, nationwide asbestosemissions are estimated as about 228,000 kg/yr. Increasing compliance to100 percent would reduce estimated emissions to 1,100 kg/yr, a decreaseof approximately 227,000 kg/yr. Considering the magnitude of asbestos emissionsassociated with current practice, amendments are being proposed to facilitateenforcement and promote compliance.A proposed revision to the standard includes the addition of a volume equivalentof 1 m\3\ (35 ft\3\) in addition to the 15 m\2\ (160 ft\2\) and 80 m (260ft). A volume of 1 m\3\ is equivalent to 15 m\2\ of asbestos assuming atypical thickness of 7.6 cm (3 in.). This was requested by enforcementofficials who stated that they often arrive at asbestos removal operations,for which no notice was given, and find the asbestos already in containers.A volume equivalent will facilitate the determination of how much asbestosis involved.A statement is added to clarify that the asbestos-containing materialsto which the standards are applicable are friable asbestos materials andalso materials that are nonfriable but may be broken or crumbled and emitasbestos fiber during demolition operations if not removed and disposedof properly. For example, asbestos cement board is not considered friableor likely to emit asbestos fibers under normal usage. However, if fracturedor crushed during a demolition or renovation, it will emit fibers and,under today's proposal, would be considered friable under those conditions.Some nonfriable asbestos-containing materials, such as packings, gaskets,asphalt roofing, and vinyl flooring, that normally do not emit asbestosfibers are not subject to the removal and disposal provisions of the standard;however, even these nonfriable materials may be subject to regulation undercertain conditions e.g., during the sanding of vinyl-asbestos flooringor when asphalt roofing is old and severely weathered. Under the proposedamendments, the amounts of these nonfriable materials must be estimatedand reported if a notification is required. The amounts of nonfriable materials,such as asbestos-cement products, that potentially can emit fibers mustbe included in the quantities reported in the notification.Several amendments being proposed today are intended to promote notificationand increase compliance. These provisions include allowing a uniform 10-dayperiod for written notification of all planned demolitions or renovations.This uniform notification requirement has been requested by industry andenforcement representatives and, in conjunction with the other notificationrequirements that would be added, is expected to improve compliance becauseit is simpler and easier to understand. However, the degree to which compliancewould be improved over current practices cannot be quantified precisely.To assist enforcement personnel in tracking asbestos demolitions, notificationis required by the following workday for demolitions ordered by State orlocal government agencies and not later than the following working dayafter stripping or removal work begins for emergency renovations. If asbestosremoval at a demolition or renovation site starts on a date other thanthat specified in the notice or if the other reported information changes,renotification is required and must be postmarked at least 5 working daysor received at least 3 working days prior to the new start date. Noticesthat are mailed are required to be sent by certified mail, return receiptrequested, in order to allow the contractor to demonstrate that EPA wasnotified. Further, andSection; 61.145(b) is amended by prohibiting asbestosremoval at demolitions and renovations from starting on any date otherthan the one contained in the applicable notification. The purpose of thisamendment is to allow enforcement personnel to observe removal operationsat demolition and renovation sites. This requirement is needed becausesome asbestos removal operations are completed before the starting datesspecified in the notification, precluding inspections for compliance byenforcement personnel.The notification provisions have been revised to require, in addition tothe name and address, the telephone number of both the owner and operatorto provide enforcement personnel with information necessary to track complianceactivity and to prioritize inspections. The proposed amendments clarifythat, if the demolition or renovation operation will involve less thanthe total amount of asbestos material in the facility, only the amountto be removed has to be reported. The revised notification provisions requirethat information on the amount of potentially friable asbestos-containingmaterial and the amount of nonfriable asbestos-containing material thatwill not become friable in the course of the demolition and renovationbe reported in the notification. In addition, the owner or operator submittinga notification is required to include the procedure employed to detectthe presence of asbestos materials as part of the notification. Knowingthe procedure used, enforcement personnel are better able to evaluate theadequacy of the building survey and asbestos analysis already requiredby the current standard. Because building survey and analysis are alreadyrequired, the additional cost of describing the procedure employed is negligible.To ensure that an effort is made to locate all of the asbestos, the currentnotification provisions require owners or operators of demolitions andrenovations to identify all asbestos, including asbestos that is encasedor covered by a nonasbestos material, prior to beginning operations thatwould break up or preclude access to the material for subsequent removal.For example, the current NESHAP has been correctly interpreted to requirethat friable asbestos pipe lagging covered with a nonfriable painted canvasor metal jacket must be included in the notification and removed priorto a demolition or renovation that would disturb the asbestos or precludeaccess to it. Given the nature and complexity of some renovations and demolitions,it is possible that some asbestos may not be discovered until after demolitionor renovation has begun or previously nonfriable material may become friable.To cover these situations, the proposed amendments will add a requirementfor owners or operators to include contingency plans in their notificationsdescribing what they will do if they find unexpected asbestos or if previouslynonfriable material becomes friable. Under the current standards, the demolitionor renovation work would have to cease until EPA was notified, but EPAdecided that this would be unnecessary provided contingency plans are includedin the notification. For asbestos that is not discovered until after demolitionbegins, the owner or operator is given the choice of removing the asbestosor, if removal cannot be done safely, keeping the asbestos and asbestos-contaminateddebris wet. This revision is proposed in recognition of a situation inwhich worker safety may be threatened and provides a reasonable alternativewhile adequately controlling emissions. The only other exceptions to therequirements to remove friable asbestos are found in andSection; 61.145(a)(3),which applies to facilities demolished under a State or local governmentorder, and in andSection; 61.145(c)(1)(i), which applies to friable materialencased in concrete. In both of these instances, wetting of the asbestosis still required.Another proposed amendment requires the owner or operator submitting anotification to certify that at least one on-site representative, suchas a foreman or management-level person trained as required by andSection;61.145(c)(8), will supervise the demolition and renovation covered by thenotification. Another amendment to this section specifies that the startand completion dates required in the notification pertain to the datesthat asbestos removal and related operations, such as site preparation,will begin and end in addition to the scheduled starting and completiondates of the demolition, wrecking, or renovation. Waiting periods betweennotification and initiation of work also are clarified to state explicitlythat they refer to the initiation of asbestos stripping and removal andrelated work. This clarifies the regulation to read as it currently isinterpreted and would permit certain demolition and renovation activities(such as site preparation, the removal of salvageable fixtures and equipment,and other activities that do not disturb asbestos or preclude access tothe material) to begin before the required waiting periods expire. It doesnot permit the demolition of nonasbestos structures before the requiredwaiting period. This accommodates the contractors' need to initiate variousactivities at demolition and renovation sites while giving enforcementpersonnel adequate advance notice.The notification must state whether it is for a demolition or a renovation.In addition, a proposed amendment clarifies the current requirement thatnotifications must be made for all demolitions, even when no asbestos ispresent, in order to promote compliance and aid enforcement. In addition,a provision is added that makes it clear that planned renovations involvingless than the specified amounts of asbestos are not subject to the notificationprovisions of the regulation.Additional notification requirements have been added for State or localgovernment-ordered demolitions, andSection; 61.145(b)(4)(xiii), and emergencyrenovations, andSection; 61.145(b)(xiv). Notification regarding ordered demolitionsmust now include the date the order was issued and the date on which thedemolition was ordered to begin. This change was requested by enforcementofficials who were concerned that, without this requirement, the notificationprovisions for ordered demolitions would be abused. For emergency renovations,additonal information is required on the nature of the sudden unexpectedevent that necessitated the emergency renovation. This change was alsorequested by enforcement officials to prevent circumvention of the notificationrequirements by contractors claiming that a renovation was an emergency.To clarify whether planned renovations involving individual, nonscheduledoperations must comply with the notification provisions of andSection; 61.145(b),paragraph (a)(4)(i), is modified to require that the additive amount ofasbestos to be removed or stripped over a calendar year of January 1 throughDecember 31 be used instead of over the ``maximum period of time a predictioncan be made not to exceed 1 year.'' This clarifies the intent of the currentregulation to cover individual, nonscheduled asbestos removal operationsinvolving small amounts of asbestos if the total amount of asbestos thatwill be removed in 1 year is projected to exceed the quantities of asbestosspecified in andSection; 61.145(a). When individual renovations exceed thecutoff, a separate notification is required.In the interest of worker safety, safety will be permitted as a reasonfor exemption from the requirement to use wet methods during removal althoughandSection; 61.145(c)(3) will be revised to require that the Administrator'sapproval is obtained before removal begins. This provision is intendedto cover obvious safety hazards such as electrical hazards and, in someinstances, hot pipes or other facility components, which are not now mentionedin the regulation. The EPA recognizes that what constitutes safety hazardmay be open to interpretation; however, the Administrator must make thatdetermination on a case-by-case basis. For example, hot pipes may be thebasis for an exemption from wetting. In some situations, however, the Administratormay determine that it is reasonable for a process to be shut down to allowthe use of wet methods. The EPA does not intend for OSHA regulations tobe violated in order to comply with the NESHAP.Provisions are added that specify the conditions under which large piecesof asbestos-covered or asbestos-coated equipment can be removed from afacility and transported, stored, and reused without first stripping theasbestos. The addition of this provision recognizes that situations arisewhere certain large pieces of equipment can be removed and eventually reusedwithout disturbing the asbestos.An amendment to andSection; 61.145(c)(3)(i)(B) will allow two new work practicesin addition to the local exhaust ventilation system currently permittedfor renovations where wetting would damage equipment or pose a safety hazard.The new work practices are use of glove bag systems and covering friablematerial in leak-tight wrapping prior to removal.The glove bag is similar in principle to glove boxes used to confine andhandle hazardous materials in laboratories and is a proven control technologywidely used for small jobs. Glove bags, when properly designed, installed,and used, provide nearly complete isolation of the asbestos material. Whenproperly used, they are at least as good as and probably superior to theuse of local exhaust ventilation. They typically are used in conjunctionwith wet removals where the wetting is done inside the bag, but glove bagsalso can be used with dry removal techniques as well as with a High-EfficiencyParticulate Air (HEPA) powered vacuum system for evacuating the bag. TheEPA intends for glove bags to be used with wet removal methods inside theglove bags. While glovebags offer potential advantages, recent EPA andNIOSH studies have indicated potential problems with their use. Work placeasbestos concentrations during glovebag use have exceeded the OSHA permissibleexposure limit. Although the source of the elevated asbestos levels wasnot identified, potential sources of fiber release include air leaks, andvibrations in the pipe outside the glovebags. Workers should be made awareof these potential problems and instructed in the proper installation anduse of glovebags. In addition, it is recommended that any worker usingglove bags be protected by a respirator.Covering friable material with leak-tight wrapping prior to removal alsoprevents asbestos emissions from being released into the air and providesan alternative to stripping the asbestos, which increases the likelihoodof asbestos emissions. Permitting the use of these two work practices acknowledgeschanges that have taken place in removal methods and increases the numberof options open to demolition and renovation contractors for compliancewith this regulation.Section 61.145(c)(4) is revised to allow operators to cover and seal facilitycomponents with a lead-tight wrapping for removing the components intactfrom a facility. This method is an effective means of emission controland is currently in use. A provision also is added that permits the Administratorto approve equivalent control methods other than the wetting, glove bags,or leak-tight wrapping methods already allowed. (This provision is alsocovered under the General Provisions, but it is included in this subpartfor convenience.) So that inspectors can readily determine if alternativemethods have received Administrator approval, a copy of the approval isrequired to be kept at the demolition or renovation site for inspection.Section 61.145(c) is revised to apply to all asbestos material includingmaterials that have been stripped or removed. This is intended to clarifythat materials that were not stripped but may have fallen off facilitycomponents must be treated the same as those that were stripped. Section61.145(c)(6)(iv) is added to clarify that materials that have been removedand were contained in leak-tight wrappings do not need to be unwrappedand wetted.Section 61.145(c)(8) adds the requirement that all asbestos material bestripped, removed, and otherwise handled by a contractor or by a representativeof the facility owner or operator trained in the provisions of this regulationand the means of complying with them. This requirement will ensure thatan on-site supervisor, such as a foreman or management-level person, hasa knowledge of this regulation and approved methods of asbestos removaland handling. The training on-site supervisor does not have to be at thesite at all times but must present for a time sufficient to provide supervisionof asbestos-related operations. In addition, this proposed amendment requiresthat evidence that training has been accomplished be made available forinspection by EPA during normal business hours. This training does notreplace the training requirements of OSHA's workplace regulation (29 CFR1926.58) or the general training recommended by EPA. The ultimate objectiveof this requirement is increased compliance with this regulation and decreasedemissions. The annual cost of training in the provisions of NESHAP is estimatedto be about $1.9 million.Comments made to EPA question the intent of the requirements in andSection;61.145(c)for lowering stripped or removed materials to the ground or lower floors.The standard requires all facility components that have been removed inunits or sections to be carefully lowered to the ground. Asbestos material,other than that on facility components removed in sections or units, alsomust be carefully lowered to the ground or lower floors. If the asbestos-containingmaterial is more than 50 feet above the ground, it may be transported bya leak-tight chute or container. In all cases, it is the intent of thestandard that asbestos materials be lowered carefully to the ground ora lower floor to the greatest extent possible, not dropped or thrown. Theuse of a leak-tight chute to transport material stripped or removed 50feet above ground level is one exception to this. Another exception occursduring the stripping of asbestos material from facility components. Inthese instances, it is not always practical to prevent the stripped materialfrom falling to the ground or floor, e.g., during the stripping of asbestosmaterial from ceilings.In addition to the proposed revisions discussed above, several editorialchanges are proposed that are intended to clarify the intent of the regulationas it is now written and make it more understandable. The changes consistprimarily of adding a phrase or substituting terms for clarity and arebased on comments from both enforcement agencies and industry. One significantclarifying revision to the demolition and renovation requirements dealswith the friability of materials and is discussed under the Definitionssection of this preamble.The overall costs associated with these proposed amendments cannot be quantifiedbut are expected to be small compared to actual removal and disposal costs.Benefits also cannot be quantified precisely but should be commensuratewith the increase in compliance up to the benefits estimated for full compliance.Comments on the proposed demolition and renovation standards were submittedby the National Association of Demolition Contractors (NADC), many of whosemembers perform asbestos removal work. In general, NADC believes that anincreasingly stringent regulation increases noncompliance and results inincreased emissions rather than producing the desired opposite effect.The NADC cites as reasons for current noncompliance the notification requirementsthat treat late notifications the same as no notification, and the difficultyof identifying all asbestos in a structure prior to demolition. Contractors'concerns that an inspection may discover the unsuspected presence of asbestosresulting in a citation and the job delayed while notifying EPA are additionalreasons notification may not be given. The NADC claims that the contractorsfeel that no matter how hard they try to comply with the NESHAP, they aregoing to be found out of compliance with some provision. They believe thatby not notifying EPA, their chances of being found in violation are substantiallydecreased. Finally, NADC feels that another reason for noncompliance isthe perception that the current NESHAP is not effective in reducing emissions.In describing ways to promote compliance with the NESHAP, NADC suggestsdeveloping separate requirements for demolition and renovation becauseof differences in job characteristics, the extensive use of large equipmentin demolitions as opposed to slower manual techniques in renovations, differencesin resulting waste characteristics, and less concern about water damageat the job site from controlling dust with water at demolitions. A propertyowner who wants a building demolished is not as concerned about havinga careful asbestos removal job done as a property owner who wants to havethe asbestos removed as part of a renovation and is concerned about hisliability as a result of the removal operation. The NADC suggests thatsimplification of the regulation would help promote compliance becausemost demolition contractors are small businesses lacking the educationaland technical background to fully understand all the details of the regulation.The NADC also suggests that asbestos materials that are tightly bound ina matrix and difficult to break should be excluded from the regulationbecause they are not likely to release many asbestos fibers. Several NADCrecommendations are intended to facilitate notification, including a 10-daynotice for all jobs with approximate start and completion dates followedby a telephone notification giving specific starting dates. The writtennotification would be on a form required by EPA.The NADC recommends that each on-site supervisor be trained and suggestedgiving contractors some discretion in selecting appropriate control methodsrather than prescribing specific work practices to be followed in all situations.Finally, the NADC suggests that there be a procedure whereby unintentionalviolations could be corrected quickly without severe economic consequencesresulting from imposed fines or lengthy delays.The NADC comments include recommendations for reducing asbestos emissions,including development of regulations for abandoned buildings and reductionof disposal costs to promote proper disposal. Disposal costs could be reduced,according to NADC, by avoiding requirements for special handling or segregationmethods and avoiding special recordkeeping requirements that will causesome disposal site owners to charge more for asbestos waste in order tocover potential liability costs and will discourage others from acceptingasbestos waste. To promote the use of proper disposal sites, disposal sitesshould be encouraged to accept all asbestos waste and not question itssource or condition.The EPA has been evaluating NADC's comments and believes some have merit.Several of their comments have already been addressed in the proposed standard.The EPA is interested in receiving comments on any of the issues suggestedby NADC as likely to improve compliance.Milling, Manufacturing, and FabricatingUnder the existing standard, the owner or operator of an affected milling,manufacturing, or fabricating source may meet a no-visible-emission limitor install emission control equipment meeting the specifications describedunder andSection;61.154. Section 61.154 includes specifications for baghouses,but it also allows the use of wet collectors (i.e., scrubbers) if fabricfilters create a fire or explosion hazard.Amendments are being proposed that will retain the existing controls nowin place and add monitoring and recordkeeping provisions at a reasonablecost that will help ensure continued low emissions. Under these amendments,the owners or operators of milling, manufacturing, or fabricating operationsare required to perfom daily monitoring for visible emissions from operatingcontrol devices and process fugitive sources and weekly inspections ofcontrol devices, maintain records of monitoring and inspections results,and submit quarterly reports to EPA of results of visible emission monitoring,if visible emissions occur during the reporting period. The recordkeepingand reporting requirements will provide information to EPA that can beused to alert enforcement personnel of operating problems at individualsources and aid in determining compliance.Some control device inlet loadings are high enough that visible emissionscould occur during a malfunction of a control device. For these sources,visible emissions could be useful as an early indicator of a malfunction.A 15-second observation period for visible emission monitoring of eachcontrol device is proposed. Visible emission monitoring will identify problemsand help to ensure that pollution control equipment achieves its designemission reduction potential; weekly inspection of control devices willpermit the early identification and correction of problems that could leadto baghouse failure and increased emissions. Some small air-cleaning devicesdo not permit ready access for the interior inspection of bags. For suchdevices, the owner or operator will be required to submit a maintenanceplan for the Administrator's approval. The maintenance plan must include,as a minimum, recordkeeping and a maintenance schedule. According to industrysources, visual monitoring and inspection are already practices at manyfacilities.The EPA is proposing to delete the 4-inch water gage requirement in andSection;61.152for all existing and new baghouses because many baghouses remove particlesat high efficiencies at higher pressure drops. The proposed standard allowsthe Administrator to authorize the substitution of a wet collector fora fabric filter when it is determined that a fabric filter is not feasible.Such situations may occur, for example, when a gas stream has a high moisturecontent or the particles are sticky and would cause blinding of a fabricfilter. The current standard only permits the use of wet collectors whena fire or explosion hazard attends the use of a fabric filter.Visible emissions from fugitive sources at milling, manufacturing, andfabricating operations are also prohibited. This amendment is not a newrequirement because it clarifies the intent of the regulation as it iscurrently implemented.Assuming 100 percent compliance with the existing control requirements,nationwide asbestos emissions from milling, manufacturing, and fabricatingare estimated to total 7,400 kg/yr. The uncertainty associated with estimatesof emissions is large and was discussed previously. The actual degree ofcompliance at present is unverifiable because of the lack of explicit monitoring,inspection, recordkeeping, and reporting requirements. However, industrysources indicate that monitoring and inspection are currently practicedby most asbestos milling, manufacturing, and fabricating sources; therefore,additional costs resulting from these provisions should be small. The recordkeepingand reporting costs also are estimated to be small and are included inthe impacts of the reporting requirements. The benefits of the monitoring,inspection, recordkeeping, and reporting provisions are unquantifiable,but the provisions will aid enforcement and improve compliance so thatemissions and health risks close to the estimates for 100 percent complianceare attained.Section 61.144(a)(9) is also revised by specifying that chlorine manufacturingthat uses asbestos diaphragm technology is regulated by the NESHAP andnot chlorine manufacturing that uses other technologies. This is a clarifyingamendment; therefore, no costs are associated with this change. Paragraph (a) of andSection; 61.153 on reporting requirements is clarifiedto instruct new and existing million, manufacturing, and fabricating operationsunder what conditions and when they must report certain information onemission control equipment and processes that generate asbestos emissions.Because this amendment is a clarification, there are no associated costs.Waste DisposalProvisions for the disposal of asbestos-containing waste material are containedin the NESHAP under the authority of the CAA and AHERA. RCRA regulatesthe disposal of solid waste as either a hazardous or nonhazardous waste.Asbestos is not listed as a hazardous waste under Subtitle C of RCRA; therefore,it is regulated as a Subtitle D waste and is subject to the standards containedin 40 CFR Parts 257 and 258. Revised Subtitle D standards were proposedrecently (53 FR 33314, August 30, 1988), and changes to 40 CFR Parts 257and 258 apply to asbestos-containing waste. The waste shipment recordsbeing proposed in the asbestos NESHAP are similar to the manifest requirementsof Subtitle C, whereas Subtitle D contains no recordkeeping requirements.The current asbestos NESHAP requirement for daily cover is more specificthan are the requirements of Subtitle D. Asbestos is generally thoughtnot to be a threat to ground-water quality, although asbestos-containingwaste may contain constituents other than asbestos that may pose a threatto ground-water quality. For all of these reasons, EPA has determined thatthe asbestos NESHAP is the most efficient way for the Agency to regulatethe disposal of asbestos-containing waste material at this time. Otherregulations have been promulgated that cover specific problems. The DOThas promulgated regulations that cover the transportation of asbestos-containingwaste material, and EPA has promulgated regulations specifically governingremoval of asbestos from school buildings under the authority of AHERA.The existing asbestos NESHAP defines responsibilities for asbestos wastedisposal and requires either no visible emissions or the use of specificdisposal methods for asbestos mills; manufacturing, fabricating, demolition,renovation, and spraying operations; inactive disposal sites for asbestosmills and manufacturing and fabricating operations; and active disposalsites. As was stated earlier, enforcement experience indicates that approximately50 percent of asbestos removal operations related to demolition and renovationare performed without EPA notification. This implies that a significantvolume of demolition and renovation waste may be disposed of out of compliancewith the existing NESHAP. The actual degree of noncompliance cannot bedetermined because of a lack of reasonably available information on therelationship between notifications and compliance with the waste disposalrequirements. Risks from uncontrolled sources can be very large; therefore,amendments to the existing NESHAP are being proposed to aid enforcementand improve compliance. In addition, responsibility for waste managementand disposal is explicitly defined. Also, the proposed reporting and recordkeepingrequirements are consistent with EPA guidelines published in <T3>Asbestos Waste Management Guidance </T3>(EPA/530-SW-85-007, May 1985)for asbestos waste disposal. A provision is added that requires the broken edges of nonfriable asbestosmaterial to be wetted or encapsulated. This change is intended to helpclarify the intent of the regulation as it is now written. This is aimedprincipally at many asbestos-cement products that are normally nonfriablewhen whole but that may release fibers when broken. If the broken edgesare treated so that the asbestos fibers are sealed in, the material doesnot have to be put into leak-tight enclosures prior to its disposal ina NESHAP landfill. If the edges are wetted but not sealed, the materialwould have to be placed in leak-tight enclosures for disposal in a NESHAPlandfill.The handling and disposing of waste resulting from the demolition of buildingswhere the asbestos is encased in concrete is clarified to include similarlyhard material. A compliance option is added for the situation where theasbestos was not discovered until after demolition began. The types ofnonfriable asbestos that needed not be removed before demolition are specifiedandSection; 61.145(c)(1)(iii)). A new provision (andSection; 61.155) is added that allows the Administratorto approve waste treatment methods that destroy or transform asbestos-containingwaste into nonasbestos material and specifies the information that theAdministrator needs to make such determinations. Provisions that specifytesting for the presence of asbestos in the output material are added inaddition to provisions that require key process parameters to be continuouslymonitored. Prior to disposal, process output materials will be determinedto be asbestos-free using transmission electron microscopy (TEM), or thelocation of their disposal recorded. These provisions are needed in viewof requests received by EPA for approval of new asbestos waste treatmentmethods. Milling, manufacturing, and fabricating facilities and demolition and renovationcontractors will be required to prepare and maintain records of waste shipmentsand submit semiannual reports to EPA summarizing waste shipment records.In addition, they will be required to furnish a copy of the record of thewaste shipment to the owner or operator of the disposal site. The mostlikely mechanism will be to send a copy of the record along with the wastetransporters. This requirement will establish a record of the chain-of-custodyand alert enforcement personnel of potential violations of the waste disposalrequirements. In addition, all containers of waste will be required tobe labeled with the waste generator's name and location of the site wherethe asbestos waste was generated. This requirement will enable enforcementpersonnel to enforce the requirements for leak-tight containers where asbestosfrom multiple job sites are in a single vehicle. It will assist enforcementofficials in tracking asbestos waste shipments and in determining thatasbestos waste is being properly disposed of and result in increased compliance. At present, the waste generator is responsible for selecting a disposalsite that meets the asbestos waste disposal requirements of the NESHAP.The proposed amendments also make the disposal site owner or operator responsiblefor complying with the NESHAP provisions for waste disposal sites. Enforcementofficials have stated that the current waste disposal provisions are difficultto enforce because the responsible party, the generator, does not havesufficient control of the disposal practices used at the disposal site.This proposed amendment should increase compliance with the NESHAP provisionsat an active disposal site by making each party responsible. Specifically,the waste generator is responsible for selecting a disposal site that meetsthe NESHAP requirements, and the waste site operator is required to complywith the work practice provisions at the waste disposal site. All wastemust be disposed of at the site specified on the waste shipment record.The generator may haul his own waste, contract with the disposal site operatorfor hauling services, or contract with an independent hauler. A requirementalso is added to require the Administrator's approval before removal ordisturbance of previously deposited asbestos material at both active andinactive disposal sites. In making a decision on the request, the Administratorwill consider the following: (1) Reason for moving or removing the waste,(2) procedures to be used to control emissions, and (3) location of thefinal disposal site. At a minimum, the asbestos waste should be handledin a wet condition until final disposal. In addition, waste disposal siteoperators will be required to document all asbestos waste shipments thatare received, document the arrival of improperly contained waste, investigatediscrepancies between waste shipment records and waste actually received,document the location and quantity of asbestos in a landfill, and recordthe presence and location of asbestos and the asbestos NESHAP regulatoryauthority over the disposal site on the property deed. Waste disposal siteoperators also will be required to submit semiannual reports to EPA summarizingactivities involving the disposal of asbestos-containing waste. Enforcementpersonnel have noted that asbestos waste that is not properly documentedmay lead to future exposures if sites are disturbed. These requirementswill aid enforcement in tracking shipments of waste to ensure complianceand help avoid possible recurrence of inadvertent exposure incidents ashave been found by EPA by ensuring that future owners and users of landare alerted to the presence of asbestos waste and take adequate precautionsif the waste is disturbed. These requirements are consistent with EPA'sintent to prevent public exposure to asbestos emissions from waste disposalsites. These requirements are considered reasonable because expected costsare small and some sites already use special precautions when disposingof asbestos waste.  To retain control over disposal sites that have already become inactive,the current provisions of andSection; 61.151 for inactive disposal sitesare retained with only a few modifications. A provision is added allowingthe use of crushed stone as a final cover in desert areas where a vegetativecover is difficult to establish and maintain. This amendment offers greaterflexibility without affecting control stringency. The provisions for inactivetailing piles are revised to clarify the standard's current intent thatdust suppression agents be used in a manner to maintain dust control. The provisions that allow the Administrator to approve alternative controlmethods are modified to give more detailed instructions on requesting approvalof alternative methods. This change is intended to clarify the regulationby indicating what criteria are used by the Administrator in ruling onalternative control methods.  Vehicles used to transport waste are required to display placards warningof the presence of asbestos during the loading and unloading of waste.Such a measure will warn persons of the asbestos hazard and help preventaccidental exposures to asbestos during loading and unloading. The DOTregulations require placards during transportation of asbestos-containingwaste.  Table 1 presents the estimated nationwide asbestos emissions from disposalof demolition and renovation wastes for different levels of control. Fullcompliance with the current NESHAP would result in estimated emissionsof about 400 kg/yr. However, if (as enforcement experience implies) a significantpercentage of demolition and renovation wastes may be disposed of out ofcompliance, estimated emissions are actually 227,000 kg/yr. Most of theseemissions, an estimated 226,000 kg/yr, result from the improper disposalof asbestos waste from demolition and greatly exceed other asbestos emissions.These revisions are intended to improve compliance that will reduce asbestosemissions.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s150,10,10,10,10,10</C><T4>Table 1._</T4><T4>Estimated Nationwide Asbestos Emissions From Demolition and Renovation,</T4>akg/yr<H1>Level of control </H1><H1>Asbestos removable</H1><H2>Demolition</H2><H2>Renovation</H2><H1>Waste disposal</H1><H2>Demolition</H2><H2>Renovation</H2><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Current NESHAP (full compliance)<D>700</D><D>9</D><D>380</D><D>2</D><D>1,100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Current NESHAP (current practice)b<D>1,300</D><D>13</D><D>226,000</D><D>1,000</D><D>228,300</D><F/>a See Preamble text for discussion of uncertainties associated withestimated emissions.<F/>b Emission estimates under the current NESHAP, assuming currentpractice, are uncertain. Emission estimates are based on EPA enforcementpersonnel estimates of the level of compliance with the NESHAP notificationrequirements, rather than on the actual level of compliance with the removaland disposal requirements.</ITAG></ITAG>In addition to the proposed revisions discussed above, several editorialchanges are proposed (but not discussed) that are intended to clarify theintent of the regulation as well as make it more understandable. The changesconsist primarily of adding clarifying phrases or substituting terms forclarity and are based on comments from both enforcement agencies and industry.The costs associated with the proposed amendments are expected to be small.The recordkeeping and reporting costs are included in the impacts of thereporting requirements. The benefits of the amendments cannot be preciselyquantified, but the above assessment of the effectiveness of the currentNESHAP at full compliance and at current practice gives a measure of themagnitude of the increase in benefits that could be achieved.SprayingThe current NESHAP prohibits the use of materials that contain greaterthan 1 percent asbestos on a dry weight basis for spray-on applicationon buildings, structures, pipes, and conduits unless the asbestos fibersin the materials are encapsulated with a bituminous or resinous binderduring spraying and the materials are not friable after drying. This requirementis amended by substituting percent by area for percent by weight as theexpression for asbestos concentration as discussed under ``Friable asbestosmaterial'' in the Definitions section of this preamble.RoadwaysSection 61.143, ``Standard for roadways,'' is clarified by substituting``construct or maintain'' for ``surface.'' This revision will codify adetermination already made by EPA.The amendment will make it clear that unbound tailings are not allowedin a road base, based on a prior EPA applicability determination, unlessthe road is a temporary roadway on an area of asbestos ore deposits, i.e.,an asbestos mine. Tailings are permitted in temporary roadways at asbestosmill sites if they are encapsulated with a resinous or bituminous binder.Periodic maintenance of the encapsulated road surface to prevent dust emissionswill be required. Asbestos tailings are not permitted to be used in roadconstruction unless they are encapsulated in asphalt concrete meeting FederalHighway Administration (FHWA) roadway construction specifications. Becauseof their aggregate characteristics which give them some value for use inroad construction, tailings encapsulated in asphalt concrete will continueto be allowed. This change explicitly will permit the use of asbestos tailingswhich have been encapsulated, and which, because of the milling process,typically have a low asbestos content.Definitions``Adequately wetted'' is changed to ``Adequately wet'' because in mostplaces in the regulation, the verb ``wet'' is used. The definition clarifiesthat the owner or operator must wet asbestos to a sufficient degree toprevent any particulate emissions.To be consistent with other revisions to the standard, the definition of``Asbestos material'' was changed to ``Asbestos-containing material'' andexpanded to include both friable material and nonfriable material thatpotentially can become a source of emissions.The definition of ``Asbestos-containing waste material'' is modified togive additional examples of waste material that are covered by the regulation.The part of the definition pertaining to waste from demolition and renovationis modified to clarify that the standard applies to nonfriable materialthat can be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder by operationscovered by the regulation.The definition of ``Commercial asbestos'' is modified to clarify that itincludes any material that contains asbestos and has value because of itsasbestos content. This is consistent with EPA's previous applicabilitydetermination.The definition of ``Demolition'' is modified to clarify that the intentionalburning of load-supporting structures or the intentional burning of facilitiesis considered a demolition. This more clearly specifies that buildingsthat are intentionally burned, usually under the supervision of a firedepartment, to make way for new structures, for example, would have tocomply with the provisions for demolition and renovation, thus avoidingoccasional emissions from a previously unregulated source. Economic impactsof this amendment would be negligible because occurrences are so few.The definition of ``Emergency renovation operation'' is modified to givemore explicit criteria for what constitutes an emergency renovation.The definition of ``Fabricating'' is clarified by stating that, for frictionproducts, bonding and debonding are included.The definition of ``Facility'' is modified by adding the terms ``residential,''``public,'' ``ships,'' and ``active and inactive disposal sites.'' Addingthese terms serves to clarify the regulation to read as it is interpretedcurrently to include residential structures, publicly owned buildings,ships, and waste disposal sites.The meaning of ``Facility component'' is clarified by defining it as anypart of a facility, including equipment.The current definition of ``Friable asbestos material'' contains a thresholdof 1 percent for the amount of asbestos that must be present before friablematerial is subject to the demolition and renovation provisions. The intentof the 1 percent threshold was to distinguish between material that containedasbestos and material that did not contain asbestos within the limits ofdetection of the available analytical methods. The current definition alsoexpresses the asbestos threshold as percent by weight. The proposed standardexpresses asbestos content as percent by area to make the regulation consistentwith preferred analytical methodology, which gives results as percent byarea, and with current practice; it does not change the stringency of thestandard.The mass of asbestos present in a bulk sample cannot be determined directly.In the context of bulk sample analysis, mass is a derived property becauseit is obtained by counting and sizing asbestos particles under a microscope,assuming a geometric shape for the particles, calculating their volume,and multiplying by an assumed density. The mass of nonasbestos materialpresent in a bulk sample would be obtained by the same procedure.On the other hand, the area and type of asbestos present in a bulk samplecan be determined directly through microscopic analysis. Appendix A, SubpartF, 40 CFR Part 763, contains the approved method of bulk sample analysisfor asbestos_polarized light microscopy (PLM) and point counting and isincorporated by reference in the definition. In this method, the area ofan analytical slide occupied by asbestos particles and the area occupiedby matrix are both measured directly. The Agency is considering incorporationof this method explicitly in the final rule if it would be more convenientto use. Therefore, EPA is requesting comments on whether the method shouldbe incorporated by reference as it is in this proposal, or whether themethod should be stated explicitly in the rule.The relationship between percent weight and percent area has been studiedby EPA<T3> (Draft Relationship Between Visual Estimates and Weight Percentageof ACM).</T3> This study discusses ways to convert percent area measurementsto percent weight equivalents, generally concluding that percent weightand percent area are equivalent for most matrices in which asbestos isfound. Furthermore, using percent area will serve the same purpose as wasintended initially, i.e., whether asbestos is present or not.The cost and availability of methods for the identification and quantitationof asbestos vary greatly depending on the particular method. The TEM, forexample, is relatively expensive with costs ranging from about $500 to$700 per sample analyzed. PLM costs, however, average about $25 to $50per sample. Numerous laboratories are capable of performing PLM, whilethe number of laboratories with TEM capabilities for asbestos analysisare somewhat more limited.An informal survey by EPA's Office of Research and Development (ORD) ofanalysts performing asbestos bulk sample analyses reveals that in practicethey determine and report percent asbestos by area, not be weight. Thisis considered to be the norm rather than an exception.The EPA also considered, but rejected, a revision to the definition of``Friable asbestos material'' to include materials that can be crumbled,pulverized, or reduced to powder by the mechanical forces expected to acton the material. The intent of such a change would be to codify an interpretationalready made by EPA. The interpretation states that, in effect, the demolitionand renovation regulations apply to materials that are normally nonfriable(e.g., asbestos-cement sheet), which because of forces acting on the materialduring demolition or renovation and subsequent handling, transportation,storage or disposal operations, would result in asbestos emissions. However,as a result of numerous comments from government and industry stating thatthe existing definition of friable was well established and widely accepted,EPA has decided to retain the existing definition with the exception that``broken'' is inserted ahead of ``crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder.''This is consistent with EPA's current interpretation and application ofthis definition. Throughout the regulation where the phrase ``crumbled,pulverized, or reduced to powder'' is used, the word ``broken'' has beenadded.The standard will be revised where appropriate to regulate materials thatare normally nonfriable but potentially can be broken, crumbled, pulverized,or reduced to powder as a result of the regulated operations. Such materialsinclude, for example, A/C products and paper insulation. These materialsmust be removed from a facility prior to its demolition because they arelikely to be broken up during demolition and inaccessible after demolitionfor segregation and separate disposal in a NESHAP landfill. To the extentthat these materials can be removed without breaking or crumbling, theydo not have to be wetted and sealed in leak-tight containers, althoughthey are to be included in determining applicability and their quantitymust be included in the notification. In addition, they must be disposedof in a NESHAP landfill. Nonfriable materials that are likely to remainnonfriable and, therefore, not be subject to the demolition and renovationprovisions, include packings and gaskets, floor tile, asphalt roofing shingles,roofing felt, coatings, and sealants. However, even these nonfriable materialsmay be subject to regulation under certain situations. For example, thesanding of asbestos floor tiles that can produce asbestos emissions isconsidered a renovation and subject to the regulation. Severely weatheredasphaltic materials may become brittle and, therefore, be subject to theregulation. Because handling even normally nonfriable materials can resultin asbestos emissions under some conditions, case-by-case determinationsof friability will still be required in many instances.A definition of ``Fugitive sources'' is added to help clarify the modifiedprovisions for mills, manufacturing, and fabricating.A definition of ``Glove bag'' is added because the use of glove bags willbe permitted in renovations when wetting is determined not to be feasiblefor safety reasons or because of the potential to damage equipment. However,EPA intends for glove bags to be used with wetting inside the glove bags.The definition of ``Inactive waste disposal site'' in revised by deletingreference to vehicular traffic and stipulating that an inactive site isone at which asbestos-containing waste material has not been depositedwithin the past year.``Installation'' is defined as a building or group of buildings at a demolitionor renovation site. This definition is added to clarify the existing applicabilityrequirements for demolition or renovation. For purposes of determiningthe amount of asbestos to be stripped or removed, the amounts of asbestosin a group of buildings to be demolished or renovated are summed.``Leak-tight'' is defined to help clarify the intent of the demolitionand renovation and waste disposal requirements as they pertain to the useof leak-tight containers, wrappings, and (in the case of demolition andrenovation) the use of leak-tight chutes to convey waste from abovegroundstripping and removal operations. Leak-tight implies that, in the courseof operations covered by this regulation, the contents are sealed adequatelyto prevent any asbestos or asbestos-containing material, including contaminatedwater, from escaping. Although it is impractical to identify in advancewhat is considered leak-tight, the use of certain containers or seals maybe considered unacceptable in many instances. For example, the use of flimsytwist ties or bags of less than 6-mil thickness would not constitute ``leak-tight''under most conditions. A case-by-case determination will be required inmany instances.A definition of ``Malfunction'' is added to clarify conditions coveredby the requirements for air pollution control devices in milling, manufacturing,and fabricating.The definition of ``Manufacturing'' is revised to clarify that chlorinemanufacturing is covered by the definition. Chlorine manufacturers useasbestos in the production of chlorine rather than processing asbestosinto a final or intermediate product.``Natural barrier'' is defined to help clarify the intent of the wastedisposal requirements and, specifically, that remoteness of a disposalsite alone does not constitute a natural barrier.A definition of ``Nonscheduled operation'' is added to help clarify theintent of the applicability provisions for renovation.The definition of ``Outside air'' is `clarified by specifying that outsideair means air outside buildings and structures and includes air under bridgesand open air ferry docks.``Owner or operator of a demolition or renovation activity'' is definedto help clarify responsibility for compliance. The definition of ``owneror operator of a demolition or renovation activity'' includes the ownerof the facility being demolished or renovated. It also includes the currentowner of the property on which the facility is situated, if the owner sellsthe facility to another party for demolition or renovation. In such circumstances,the property owner, while no longer holding title to the facility, causesthe demolition or renovation to occur, and thereby owns, leases, operates,controls, or supervises the demolition or renovation operation. See, e.g.,<T3>U.S. v. Geppert Bros., Inc. et al.,</T3> 638 F. Supp. 996 (E.D.Pa.1986).The definition of ``Planned renovation operations'' is revised to requireknowledge that ``some'' friable asbestos material will be stripped or removedrather than knowledge of ``the amount of'' material to be stripped or removed.``Remove'' is clarified to include the taking out of ``asbestos-coveredfacility components.''``Renovation'' is clarified by specifying stripping and removal of asbestosas renovation activities. An additional change makes clear that wreckingor taking out load-supporting structural members is demolition.The definition of ``Roadways'' is clarified by adding the term ``publicand private'' so that it is clear that the regulation is applicable toroadways regardless of ownership.The definition of ``Strip'' is clarified by adding ``or facility components''at the end of the definition.In order to facilitate enforcement of the visible emission limitations,the definition of ``Visible emissions'' is revised to mean any emissionscoming from asbestos-containing material.``Working days'' is defined as Monday through Friday to help clarify thenotification requirements for demolition and renovation.<ITAG tagnum="84">Impacts of Reporting Requirements</ITAG>The proposed amendments to the asbestos NESHAP will impose several reportingand recordkeeping requirements. Owners or operators of milling, manufacturing,and fabricating sources will be required to maintain records of monitoringand inspections and of waste shipments and will be required to submit quarterlyreports of visible emission monitoring. Each owner or operator involvedin a demolition or renovation operation will be required to maintain recordsof waste shipments. All generators of waste will also be required to submitsemiannual reports summarizing their records of waste shipments. Ownersor operators of active waste disposal sites will be required to maintainrecords of all asbestos waste shipments, document the arrival of improperlycontained waste, maintain records of the location and quantity of asbestosin the landfill, make semiannual reports to the Administrator summarizingdisposal activities, and record on the property deed the presence and locationof asbestos. As is discussed in the rationale for the selection of theproposed amendments, the recordkeeping and reporting requirements willassist enforcement efforts.The information collection provisions summarized above have been submittedfor approval to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq. </T3>Comments on these requirements should be submitted tothe Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, OMB, 726 Jackson Place,NW., Washington, DC 20503, marked ``Attention: Desk Officer for EPA,''as well as to EPA. The final rule will respond to any OMB or public commentson the information collection requirements.An analysis of the burden associated with the proposed reporting and recordkeepingrequirements has been made. During the first 3 years of this regulation,the annual burden of the reporting and recordkeeping requirements for asbestosmills; manufacturing, demolition, renovation, spraying, and fabricatingoperations; and active and inactive waste disposal sites is estimated tobe about 308,000 person-hours.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>The RFA (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) requires EPA to consider the potential impacts of proposedstandards on small ``entities.'' If a preliminary analysis indicates thata proposed regulation would have a significant adverse economic impacton a substantial number (i.e., 20 percent or more) of small entities, thena regulatory flexibility analysis must be prepared. Current RFA guidelinesindicate that an economic impact should be considered significantly adverseif it meets one of the following criteria: (1) Annual compliance costsincrease production costs by more than 5 percent; (2) compliance costsas a percentage of sales for small entities are at least 10 percent morethan compliance costs as a percentage of sales for large entities; (3)capital costs of compliance represent a ``significant'' portion of capitalavailable to small entities, considering internal cash flow plus externalfinancial capabilities; and (4) regulatory requirements are likely to resultin closures of small entities. Effects of the proposed standard on smallfirms in the milling, manufacturing, and fabricating industry cannot beestimated because of lack of data on the existing distribution of plantsizes and on plant ownership by size of firm. It is likely that differencesin unit compliance costs between large and small entities (higher unitcosts for smaller firms) are not large enough to create significant interplantcost differences. In the demolition services industry, the increases indemolition costs and the nature of the industry itself are such that nosignificantly disproportionate impacts will be experienced by smaller entities.In the renovation services industry, the effects on smaller firms are likelyto be quite small because cost increases are slight. Thus, a regulatoryflexibility analysis is not required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Public Hearing</ITAG>A public hearing will be held, if requested, to discuss the proposed amendmentsto the asbestos NESHAP, in accordance with sections 112(b)(1)(B) and 307(d)(5)of the CAA and the Administrative Procedure Act. Persons wishing to makeoral presentations should contact EPA at the address given in the Addressessection of this preamble. Oral presentations will be limited to 15 minuteseach. Any member of the public may file a written statement before, during,or within 30 days after the hearing. Written statements should be addressedto the Central Docket Section address given in the Addresses section ofthis preamble and should refer to Docket No. A-88-28.A verbatim transcript of the hearing and written statements will be availablefor public inspection and copying during normal working hours at EPA'sCentral Docket Section in Washington, DC (see Addresses section of thispreamble).<ITAG tagnum="84">Docket</ITAG>The docket is an organized and complete file of all the information submittedto or otherwise considered by EPA in the development of the proposed amendments.The principal purposes of the docket are: (1) To allow interested partiesto identify and locate documents so that they can participate effectivelyin the rulemaking process and (2) to serve as the record in case of judicialreview (except for interagency review materials (Section 307(d)(7)(A)).<ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous</ITAG>When the amended asbestos NESHAP is reviewed again, the review will includean assessment of such factors as the need for integration with other programs,the existence of alternative methods, enforceability, improvements in emissioncontrol technology and health data, and reporting requirements. The reportingrequirements in this standard will be reviewed as required under the EPAsunset policy for reporting requirements in regulations.In accordance with section 117 of the CAA, publication of this proposalwas preceded by consultation with appropriate advisory committees, independentexperts, and Federal departments and agencies. In addition, numerous meetingswere held with industry representatives and trade associations during developmentof the proposed amendments. The Administrator will welcome comments withinthe public comment period, on all aspects of the proposed regulation, includingeconomic and technological issues, and on the proposed test method.Comments are specifically invited on the following aspects of the proposedamendments:andbullet; Expressing asbestos content of materials as percent by area;andbullet; Requiring weekly inspections of air cleaning devices at mills,and manufacturing and fabricating operations, and keeping records of same;andbullet; Requiring notification of demolitions where no asbestos is involved;andbullet; Training of asbestos removal contractors;andbullet; Comments by NADC to improve compliance.Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a regulation is ``major''and therefore subject to the requirement of a Regulatory Impact Analysis.This regulation is not major because it would result in none of the adverseeconomic impacts set forth in section 1 of the Executive Order as groundsfor finding a regulation to be major. The industry-wide annualized costsin the fifth year after the standards would go into effect would be approximately$9.3 million, less than the $100 million established as the first criterionfor a major regulation in the Order. The estimated price increases on asbestosproducts would not be considered ``major increases in costs or prices''specified as the second criterion in the Order. The analysis of the proposedamendments' effect on the asbestos industry did not indicate any significantadverse effects on competition, investment, productivity, employment, innovation,or the ability of U.S. firms to compete with foreign firms (the third criterionof the Order).This regulation was submitted to OMB for review as required by ExecutiveOrder 12291. Any written comments from OMB to EPA and any EPA responsesto those comments will be included in Docket No. A-88-28. This docket isavailable for public inspection at EPA's Central Docket Section, whichis listed under the Addresses section of this preamble.Pursuant to the provisions of 5 U.S.C. 605(b), I hereby certify that thisrule, if promulgated, will not have a significant economic impact on asubstantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Parts 61 and 763</ITAG>Asbestos, Beryllium, Hazardous substances, Mercury, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Vinyl chloride, Blast furnaces, Steel mills.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: December 22, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>It is proposed that 40 CFR Chapter I be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 61_[AMENDED]</ITAG>I. In Part 61:1. The authority citation for 40 CFR Part 61, Subpart M is revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 101, 112, 114, 116, 301 of the Clean Air Actas amended (42 U.S.C. 7401, 7412, 7414, 7416, 7601); Sec. 203 of the ToxicSubstances Control Act, 15 U.S.C. 2643.</ITAG>2. The table of sections is revised in its entirety to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart M_National Emission Standard for Asbestos</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.140 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.141 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.142 Standard for asbestos mills.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.143 Standard for roadways.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.144 Standard for manufacturing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.145 Standard for demolition and renovation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.146 Standard for spraying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.147 Standard for fabricating.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.148 Standard for insulating materials.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.149 Standard for waste disposal for asbestos mills.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.150 Standard for waste disposal for manufacturing, fabricating,demolition, renovation, and spraying operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.151 Standard for inactive waste disposal sites for asbestos millsand manufacturing and fabricating operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.152 Air cleaning.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.153 Reporting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.154 Standard for active waste disposal sites.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.155 Standard for sites that convert asbestos-containing waste materialinto nonasbestos (asbestos-free) material.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.156 Cross reference to other asbestos regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.157 Delegation of authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Figures to Subpart M</ITAG>3. Section 61.140 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.140</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>The provisions of this subpart are applicable to those sources specifiedin andSection;andSection; 61.142 through 61.151, 61.154, and 61.155.4. In andSection; 61.141, the following definitions are revised: ``Asbestos-containingwaste materials,'' ``Commercial asbestos,'' ``Demolition,'' ``Emergencyrenovation operation,'' ``Fabricating,'' ``Facility,'' ``Facility component,''``Friable asbestos material,'' ``Inactive waste disposal site,'' ``Manufacturing,''``Natural barrier,'' ``Outside air,'' ``Particulate asbestos material,''``Planned renovation operation,'' ``Remove,'' ``Renovation,'' ``Roadways,''``Strip,'' and ``Visible emissions.'' The following definitions are added:``Adequately wet,'' ``Asbestos-containing material,'' ``EPA identificationnumber,'' ``Fugitive sources,'' ``Glove bag,'' ``Installation,'' ``Leak-tight,''``Malfunction,'' ``Natural barrier,'' ``Nonscheduled renovation operation,''``Owner or operator,'' ``Waste generator,'' ``Waste shipment record,''``Working days.'' The definitions, ``Adequately wetted'' and ``Asbestosmaterial,'' are removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.141</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>All terms that are used in this subpart and are not defined below are giventhe same meaning as in the Act and in Subpart A of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Adequately wet'' means sufficiently mix or penetrate with liquid to preventthe release of particulates. If visible emissions are observed coming fromasbestos-containing material, then that material has not been adequatelywetted. However, the absence of visible emissions is not sufficient evidenceof being adequately wet.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Asbestos-containing material'' means friable asbestos material, and nonfriableasbestos material that potentially can be broken, crumbled, pulverized,or reduced to powder in the course of operations regulated by this subpart.``Asbestos-containing waste materials'' means any waste that contains commercialasbestos and is generated by a source subject to the provisions of thissubpart. This term includes asbestos mill tailings, asbestos waste includingfilters from control devices, friable asbestos waste material, and bagsor containers that previously contained commercial asbestos. As appliedto demolition and renovation operations, this term also includes nonfriableasbestos waste that can be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced topowder in the course of demolition and renovation operations covered bythis subpart, and materials contaminated with asbestos including equipmentand clothing.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Commercial asbestos'' means any material containing asbestos that isextracted from ore and has value because of its asbestos content.``Demolition'' means the wrecking or taking out of any load-supportingstructural member of a facility together with any related handling operationsor the intentional burning of any facility.``Emergency renovation operation'' means a renovation operation that wasnot planned but results from a sudden, unexpected event that results inunsafe conditions. This term includes operations necessitated by nonroutinefailures of equipment.``EPA identification number'' means the number assigned by EPA to eachwaste generator.``Fabricating'' means any processing of a manufactured product that containscommercial asbestos, with the exception of processing, or field fabricating,at temporary sites for the construction or restoration of facilities. Inthe case of friction products, fabricating includes bonding and debonding.``Facility'' means any institutional, commercial, public, industrial, orresidential structure, installation, or building (residential buildingshaving four or fewer dwelling units are excluded); any ship; and any activeand inactive waste disposal site.``Facility component'' means any part of a facility including equipment.``Friable asbestos material'' means any material containing more than 1percent asbestos by area as determined by the method specified in AppendixA, Subpart F, 40 CFR Part 763 that, when dry, can be broken, crumbled,pulverized, or reduced to powder by hand pressure.``Fugitive sources'' means any source not controlled by an air pollutioncontrol device.``Glove bag'' means a sealed compartment with attached inner gloves usedfor the handling of asbestos-containing materials. Properly installed andused, glove bags provide a small work area enclosure typically used forsmall-scale asbestos stripping operations. Information on glove-bag installation,equipment and supplies, and work practices is contained in the OccupationalSafety and Health Administration's (OSHA) final rule on occupational exposureto asbestos (Appendix G to 29 CFR 1926.58).``Inactive waste disposal site'' means any disposal site or portion ofit where additional asbestos-containing waste material has not been depositedwithin the past year.``Installation'' means any building or structure or any group of buildingsor structures at a single demolition or renovation site that are underthe control of a single entity (i.e., one owner or one operator).``Leak-tight'' means that solids or liquids cannot escape or spill out.It also means dust-tight.``Malfunction'' means any sudden and unavoidable failure of air pollutioncontrol equipment or process equipment or of a process to operate in anormal or usual manner so that emissions of asbestos are increased. Failuresof equipment shall not be considered malfunctions if they are caused inany way by poor maintenance, careless operations, or any other preventableequipment breakdown.``Manufacturing'' means the combining of commercial asbestos_or, in thecase of woven friction products, the combining of textiles containing commercialasbestos_with any other material(s), including commercial asbestos, andthe processing of this combination into a product. Chlorine productionis considered a part of manufacturing.``Natural barrier'' means a natural object that effectively precludes ordeters access. Natural barriers include physical obstacles such as cliffs,lakes or other large bodies of water, deep and wide ravines, and mountains.Remoteness by itself is not a natural barrier.``Nonscheduled renovation operation'' means a renovation operation thatis not planned but is caused by the routine failure of equipment.``Owner or operator of a demolition or renovation activity'' means anyperson who owns, leases, operates, controls, or supervises the facilitybeing demolished or renovated or any person who owns, leases, operates,controls, or supervises the demolition or renovation operation, or both.``Outside air'' means the air outside buildings and structures, including,but not limited to, the air under a bridge or in an open air ferry dock.``Particulate asbestos material'' means finely divided particles of asbestosor material containing asbestos.``Planned renovation operations'' means a renovation operation, or a numberof such operations, in which some friable asbestos material will be removedor stripped within a given period of time and which can be predicted. Individualnonscheduled operations are included if a number of such operations canbe predicted to occur during a given period of time based on operatingexperience.``Remove'' means to take out asbestos-containing materials or asbestos-coveredfacility components from any facility.``Renovation'' means altering in any way one or more facility componentsincluding the stripping or removal of asbestos-containing material fromfacility components. Operations in which load-supporting structural membersare wrecked or taken out are demolitions.``Roadways'' means surfaces on which motor vehicles travel. This term includespublic and private highways, roads, streets, parking areas, and driveways.``Strip'' means to take off asbestos-containing materials from any partof a facility or facility components.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Visible emissions'' means any emissions, which are visually detectablewithout the aid of instruments, coming from asbestos-containing material.This does not include condensed uncombined water vapor.``Waste generator'' means any owner or operator of a source covered bythis subpart whose act or process produces asbestos-containing waste material.``Waste shipment record'' means the shipping document, originated and signedby the generator, used to substantiate the disposition of asbestos-containingwaste material.``Working days'' means Monday through Friday and includes holidays thatfall on any of the days Monday through Friday.5. Section 61.142 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.142</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for asbestos mills.</ITAG>(a) Each owner or operator of an asbestos mill shall either discharge novisible emissions to the outside air from that asbestos mill, includingfugitive sources, or use the methods specified by andSection; 61.152 to cleanemissions containing particulate asbestos material before they escape to,or are vented to, the outside air.(b) Each owner or operator of an asbestos mill shall meet the followingrequirements:(1) Monitor each potential source of asbestos emissions from any part ofthe mill facility, including air cleaning devices, process equipment, andbuildings that house equipment for material processing and handling, atleast once each day, during daylight hours, for visible emissions to theoutside air during operation. The monitoring period shall be of at least15 seconds duration per source of emissions.(2) Inspect each air cleaning device at least once each week for properoperation and for changes that signal the potential for malfunction including,to the maximum extent possible without dismantling other than opening thedevice, the presence of tears, holes, and abrasions in filter bags andfor dust deposits on the clean side of bags. For air cleaning devices thatcannot be inspected on a weekly basis according to this paragraph, submitto the Administrator and revise as necessary, a written maintenance planto include at a minimum, the following:(i) Maintenance schedule.(ii) Recordkeeping plan.(3) Maintain records of the results of visible emissions monitoring andcontrol device inspections using a format similar to that shown in Figures1 and 2 and include the following:(i) Date and time of inspection.(ii) Presence or absence of visible emissions.(iii) Condition of bags, including presence of tears, holes, and abrasions.(iv) Presence of dust deposits on clean side of bags.(v) Brief description of corrective actions taken including date and time.(vi) Daily hours of operation for each control device.(4) Furnish upon request, and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator, all records required under this section.(5) Retain a copy of all monitoring and inspection records for at least2 years.(6) Submit quarterly a copy of the visible emission monitoring recordsto the Administrator if visible emissions occurred during the report period.Quarterly reports shall be postmarked by the 30th day following the endof the calendar quarter.6. Section 61.143 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.143</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for roadways.</ITAG>No person may construct or maintain a roadway with asbestos tailings orasbestos-containing waste material on that roadway, unless, for asbestostailings,(a) It is a temporary roadway on an area of asbestos ore deposits (asbestosmine); or(b) It is a temporary roadway at an asbestos mill site and is encapsulatedwith a resinous or bituminous binder. The encapsulated road surface mustbe maintained at a minimum frequency of once per year to prevent dust emissions;or(c) It is encapsulated in asphalt concrete meeting the specifications containedin Section 401 of Standard Specifications for Construction of Roads andBridges on Federal Highway Projects, FP-85, 1985, or their equivalent.7. In andSection; 61.144, paragraph (a)(9) and paragraphs (b) (1) and (2)are revised and paragraphs (b)(3) through (b)(8) are added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.144</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for manufacturing.</ITAG>(a) * * *(9) The manufacture of chlorine utilizing the asbestos diaphragm technology.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(1) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from these operationsor from any building or structure in which they are conducted or from anyother fugitive sources; or(2) Use the methods specified by andSection; 61.152 to clean emissions fromthese operations containing particulate asbestos material before they escapeto, or are vented to, the outside air.(3) Monitor each potential source of asbestos emissions from any part ofthe manufacturing facility including air cleaning devices, process equipment,and buildings housing material processing and handling equipment, at leastonce each day during daylight hours, for visible emissions to the outsideair during operation. The monitoring period shall be of at least 15 secondsduration per source of emissions.(4) Inspect each air cleaning device at least once each week for properoperation and for changes that signal the potential for malfunctions including,to the maximum extent possible without dismantling other than opening thedevice, the presence of tears, holes, and abrasions in filter bags andfor dust deposits on the clean side of bags. For air cleaning devices thatcannot be inspected on a weekly basis according to this paragraph, submitto the Administrator, and revise as necessary, a written maintenance planto include, at a minimum, the following:(i) Maintenance schedule.(ii) Recordkeeping plan.(5) Maintain records of the results of visible emission monitoring andair cleaning device inspections using a format similar to that shown inFigures 1 and 2 and include the following:(i) Date and time of inspection.(ii) Presence or absence of visible emissions.(iii) Condition of bags, including presence of tears, holes, and abrasions.(iv) Presence of dust deposits on clean side of bags.(v) Brief description of corrective actions taken including date and time.(vi) Daily hours of operation for each control device.(6) Furnish upon request, and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator, all records required under this section.(7) Retain a copy of all monitoring and inspection records for at least2 years.(8) Submit quarterly a copy of the visible emission monitoring recordsto the Administrator if visible emissions occurred during the report period.Quarterly reports shall be postmarked by the 30th day following the endof the calendar quarter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 61.146 and 61.147</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>8. Sections 61.146 and 61.147 are removed, and andSection; 61.145 is revisedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 61.145</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for demolition and renovation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability.</T3> The requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of thissection apply to each owner or operator of a demolition or renovation activityincluding the removal of asbestos-containing material as follows:(1) If the amount of asbestos-containing material in a facility being demolishedis at least 80 linear meters (260 linear feet) on pipes or at least 15square meters (160 square feet) on other facility components or a totalof at least one cubic meter (35 cubic feet) on or off all facility componentsin a facility being demolished, all the requirements of paragraphs (b)and (c) of this section apply, except as provided in paragraph (a)(3) ofthis section.(2) If in a facility being demolished, the amount of asbestos-containingmaterial is less than 80 linear meters (260 linear feet) on pipes and lessthan 15 square meters (160 square feet) on other facility components andif the total amount present in or off all facility components in a facilitybeing demolished is less than one cubic meter (35 cubic feet) or thereis no asbestos, only the notification requirements of paragraphs (b) (1),(2), (3) (i) and (iv), and (4) (i) through (vi) and (4) (viii) and (xv)of this section apply.(3) If the facility is being demolished under an order of a State or localgovernment agency, issued because the facility is structurally unsoundand in danger of imminent collapse, only the requirements of paragraphs(b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3)(iii), (b)(4) (except (b)(4)(vii)), (b)(5), and (c)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) of this section apply.(4) If at least 80 linear meters (260 linear feet) of asbestos-containingmaterials on pipes or at least 15 square meters (160 square feet) of asbestos-containingmaterials on other facility components or a total of at least one cubicmeter (35 cubic feet) on or off all facility components are stripped, removed,or otherwise disturbed from a facility being renovated including any individualnonscheduled renovation operation, all the requirements of paragraphs (b)and (c) of this section apply.(i) To determine whether paragraph (a)(4) of this section applies to plannedrenovation operations involving individual nonscheduled operations, predictthe additive amount of asbestos-containing materials to be removed or strippedfrom one or more facilities during a calendar year of January 1 throughDecember 31.(ii) To determine whether paragraph (a)(4) of this section applies to emergencyrenovation operations, estimate the amount of asbestos-containing materialsto be removed or stripped as a result of the sudden, unexpected event thatnecessitated the renovation.(5) For the purpose of determining applicability, do not include materialsthat cannot become friable, such as packings, gaskets, asphalt roofing,and vinyl floor tile that are in good condition. Owners or operators ofdemolition and renovation operations are exempt from the requirements ofandSection;andSection; 61.05(a), 61.07, and 61.09.(b) <T3>Notification requirements.</T3> Each owner or operator of a demolitionor renovation activity to which this section applies shall:(1) Provide the Administrator with written notice of intention to demolishor renovate. Update notice, as necessary, including when the amount ofasbestos affected changes.(2) Send the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or handdeliver the written notice.(3) Postmark or deliver the notice as follows:(i) At least 10 working days before asbestos stripping or removal workor other activities such as site preparation which would disturb any asbestosmaterial in a demolition or renovation begin, if the operation is describedin paragraphs (a) (1) and (4) (except (a)(4)(i) and (a)(4)(ii)), of thissection. If the operation is described in paragraph (a)(2) of this section,notification is required 10 working days before demolition begins.(ii) For renovations described in paragraph (a)(4)(i) of this section,send by certified mail, return receipt requested and postmarked or handdeliver notice 10 working days before the end of the calendar year precedingthe year for which notice is being given.(iii) As early as possible before, but not later than the following workingday after asbesto stripping or removal work in a renovation begins, ifthe operation is described in paragraph (a)(4)(ii) of this section or asearly as possible before or by the following working day if the operationis a demolition described in paragraph (a)(3) of this section.(iv) If asbestos stripping or removal work in demolition or renovationoperations, described in paragraphs (a)(1) and (4) (except (a)(4)(i) and(a)(4)(ii)) of this section, will begin on a date other than the one containedin the notice, written notice of the new start date must be sent by certifiedmail, return receipt requested and postmarked at least 5 working days orreceived at least 3 working days before asbestos stripping or removal workin a demolition or renovation begins and postmarked at least 5 workingdays or received at least 3 working days before the original start date.For demolitions covered by paragraph (a)(2) of this section, written noticeof the new start date must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requestedand postmarked at least 5 working days or received at least 3 working daysprior to commencement of demolition. In no event shall an operation coveredby this provision begin on a date other than the date contained in thewritten notice of the new start date.(4) Include the following in the notice:(i) Name, address, and telephone number of owner and operator.(ii) Type of operation: Demolition or renovation.(iii) Description of the facility including the size (square meters) (squarefeet) and number of floors), age, and present or prior use of the facility.(iv) Procedure employed to detect the presence of asbestos-containing materials.(v) Estimate of the approximate amount of asbestos-containing material,including nonfriable asbestos material that will not be broken, crumbled,pulverized, or reduce to powder in the course of operations regulated bythis section, to be removed from the facility in terms of length of pipein linear meters (linear feet), surface area in square meters (square feet)on other facility components, and volume on both in cubic meters (cubicfeet). Provide separate estimates of the amounts of friable asbestos-containingmaterial; the amount of nonfriable asbestos-containing material that hasthe potential to be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder;and the amount of nonfriable asbestos-containing material that will notbe broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder in the course ofoperations regulated by this section. (vi) Location and address of the facility being demolished or renovated.(vii) Scheduled starting and completion dates of asbestos removal workin a demolition or renovation; planned renovation operations involvingindividual nonscheduled operations shall only include the beginning andending dates of the report period as described in paragraph (a)(4)(i) ofthis section. (viii) Scheduled starting and completion dates of demolition or renovation.(ix) Description of planned demolition or renovation work to be performedand method(s) to be employed including demolition or renovation techniquesto be used and description of affected facility components. (x) Description of work practices and engineering controls to be used tocomply with the requirements of this subpart, including asbestos removaland waste handling emission control procedures and the procedures to preventnonfirable material from being broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reducedto powder in course of operations regulated by this section. (xi) Name and location of the waste disposal site where the asbestos containingwaste material, including nonfriable asbestos that has the potential tobe broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder in the course ofoperations regulated by this section will be deposited. (xii) A certification that only an owner or operator of a demolition orrenovation activity trained as required by paragraph (c)(8) of this sectionwill supervise in the stripping and removal described by this notification.(xiii) For facilities described in paragraph (a)(3) of this section, thename, title, and authority of the State or local government representativewho has ordered the demolition, the date that the order was issued, andthe date on which the demolition was ordered to begin. (xiv) For emergency renovations described in paragraph (a)(4)(ii) of thissection, the date and hour that the emergency occurred, a description ofthe sudden unexpected event, and an explanation of how the event has causedunsafe conditions. (xv) Description of procedures to be followed in the event that unexpectedasbestos is found or previously nonfriable asbestos material becomes broken,crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder. (5) The information required in paragraph (b)(4) of this section must bereported using a form similar to that shown in Figure 3. (c) <T3>Procedures for asbestos emission control. </T3>Each owner or operatorof a demolition or renovation activity to whom this section applies shallcomply with the following procedures: (1) Remove asbestos-containing materials from a facility being demolishedor renovated before any activities that would disturb the materials orpreclude access to the materials for subsequent removal. However, asbestos-containingmaterials need not be removed before demolition if: (i) They are on a facility component that is encased in concrete or othersimilarly hard material and are adequately wetted whenever exposed duringdemolition; or (ii) They were not accessible for testing and were not discovered untilafter demolition began and, as a result, cannot be safely removed. If notremoved for safety reasons, the exposed asbestos-containing material andany asbestos-contaminated debris must be adequately wetted. (iii) They are materials that cannot become friable during demolition orrenovation, such as, packing, gaskets, asphalt roofing, and vinyl floortile in good condition. (2) When a facility component that contains asbestos or that is coveredor coated with asbestos-containing materials is being taken out of thefacility as units or in sections: (i) Adequately wet any asbestos-containing materials exposed during cuttingor disjoining operations; and (ii) Carefully lower the units or sections to ground level not dropping,throwing, sliding or otherwise damaging them. (3) When asbestos-containing material is stripped from facility componentsin a facility, adequately wet the asbestos-containing material during thestripping operation. (i) In renovation operations, wetting is not required if the owner or operatorhas obtained written approval from the Administrator by: (A) Asking the administrator to determine whether wetting to comply withthis paragraph would unavoidably damage equipment or present a safety hazard,and supplying the Administrator with adequate information to make thisdetermination before beginning to strip asbestos-containing material; and(B) Using one of the following when the Administrator does determine thatequipment damage would be unavoidable or that a safety hazard would exist:(<T3>1</T3>) A local exhaust ventilation and collection system designedand operated to capture the particulate asbestos material produced by thestripping and removal of the asbestos materials. The system must exhibitno visible emissions to the outside air or be designed and operated inaccordance with the requirements of andSection; 61.152. (<T3>2</T3>) A glove-bag system designed and operated to capture the particulateasbestos material produced by the stripping of the asbestos materials.(<T3>3</T3>) Leak-tight wrapping to contain all asbestos-containing materialprior to dismantlement. (ii) In renovation operations where wetting or the methods allowed in paragraph(c)(3)(i) of this section cannot be used, other methods may be used afterobtaining written approval from the Administrator upon determination thatthey are equivalent to wetting or the methods allowed in paragraph (c)(3)(i)of this section. (iii) A copy of the Administrator's written approval shall be kept at theworksite and available for inspection. (4) After a facility component covered or coated with asbestos-containingmaterial has been taken out of the facility as units or in sections, itmust be stripped or contained in leak-tight wrapping for disposal, exceptas described in paragraph (c)(5) of this section. If stripped, either:(i) Adequately wet asbestos-containing materials during stripping; or (ii) Use a local exhaust ventilation and collection system designed andoperated to capture the particulate asbestos material produced by the stripping.The system must exhibit no visible emissions to the outside air or be designedand operated in accordance with the requirements in andSection; 61.152. (5) For large facility components such as reactor vessels, large tanks,and steam generators, but not beams, the asbestos is not required to bestripped if the following requirements are met: (i) They can be removed, transported, stored, and reused without disturbingor damaging the asbestos. (ii) They are encased in a leak-tight wrapping. (iii) It is labeled according to andSection; 61.149(d)(1)(i), (ii), and (iii)during all loading and unloading operations and during storage. (6) For all asbestos-containing materials including those that have beenremoved or stripped: (i) Adequately wet the materials to ensure that they remain wet until theyare collected and contained or treated in preparation for disposal in accordancewith andSection; 61.150; and (ii) Carefully lower the materials to the ground or a lower floor, notdropping, throwing, sliding, or otherwise damaging them; and (iii) Transport the materials to the ground via leak-tight chutes or containersif they have been removed or stripped more than 50 feet above ground leveland were not removed as units or in sections. (iv) Asbestos-containing materials contained in leak-tight wrapping thathave been removed in accordance with paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(3)(i)(B)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section need not be wetted. (7) When the temperature at the point of wetting is below 0anddegrees;C (32anddegrees;F):(i) The owner or operator need not comply with paragraph (c)(2)(i) of thissection and the wetting provisions of paragraph (c)(3) of this section.(ii) The owner or operator must remove facility components coated or coveredwith asbestos-containing materials as units or in sections to the maximumextent possible. (iii) During periods when wetting operations are suspended due to freezingtemperatures, the owner or operator must record the temperature at thebeginning, middle, and end of each work day and keep daily temperaturerecords available for inspection by the Administrator during normal businesshours at the demolition or renovation site. The owner or operator shallretain the records of temperature for at least 2 years.  (8) All asbestos-containing material shall be stripped, removed, and otherwisehandled by an owner or operator of a demolition or renovation activitywith at least one on-site representative, such as a foreman or managementlevel person, trained in the provisions of this regulation and the meansof complying with them. The required training shall include as a minimum:applicability; notifications; control procedures for removals including,at least, wetting, local exhaust ventilation, negative pressure enclosures,glove-bag procedures, and High Efficiency Particulate Air (HEPA) filters;waste disposal work practices; reporting and recordkeeping; and asbestoshazards and worker protection. Evidence that the required training hasbeen accomplished shall be made available for inspection by the Administratorduring normal business hours at the demolition or renovation site. Thisrequirement shall become effective one year after promulgation of thisregulation. This training does not replace the training requirements ofthe Office of Pesticides and Toxic Substances nor the training requirementsof OSHA in 29 CFR 1926.58.  (9) For facilities described in paragraph (a)(3) of this section, adequatelywet the portion of the facility that contains asbestos-containing materialsduring the wrecking operation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.148 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.146 and Amended] </ITAG>9. Section 61.148 is redesignated as andSection; 61.146 and is amended byrevising paragraphs (a), the introductory text of (b), paragraph (b)(2),and paragraph (d) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.146 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for spraying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(a) Use materials that contain 1 percent asbestos or less by area for spray-onapplication on buildings, structures, pipes, and conduits, except as providedin paragraph (c) of this section.  (b) For spray-on application of materials that contain more than 1 percentasbestos by area on equipment and machinery, except as provided in paragraph(c) of this section: <ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * * </ITAG>(2) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from spray-on applicationof the asbestos-containing material or use the methods specified by andSection;61.152 to clean emissions containing particulate asbestos material beforethey escape to, or are vented to, the outside air. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(d) Owners or operators of sources subject to this paragraph are exemptfrom the requirements of andSection;andSection; 61.05(a), 61.07, and 61.09.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.149 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.147 and Amended] </ITAG>10. Section 61.149 is redesignated as andSection; 61.147, paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) are revised, and paragraphs (b)(3) through (b)(8) are addedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.147 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for fabricating.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *   </ITAG>(b) * * *(1) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from any of the operationsor from any building or structure in which they are conducted or from anyother fugitive sources; or (2) Use the methods specified by andSection; 61.152 to clean emissions containingparticulate asbestos material before they escape to, or are vented to,the outside air. (3) Monitor each potential source of asbestos emissions from any part ofthe fabricating facility including air cleaning devices, process equipment,and buildings that house equipment for material processing and handling,at least once each day, during daylight hours, for visible emissions tothe outside air during operation. The monitoring period shall be of atleast 15 seconds duration per source of emissions.  (4) Inspect each air cleaning device at least once each week for properoperation and for changes that signal the potential for malfunctions including,to the maximum extent possible, the presence of tears, holes, and abrasionsin filter bags and for dust deposits on the clean side of bags. For aircleaning devices that cannot be inspected on a weekly basis according tothis paragraph, submit to the Administrator, and revise as necessary, awritten maintenance plan to include, at a minimum, the following:  (i) Maintenance schedule.  (ii) Recordkeeping plan.  (5) Maintain records of the results of visible emission monitoring andair cleaning device inspections using a format similar to that shown inFigures 1 and 2 and include the following:  (i) Date and time of inspection.  (ii) Presence or absence of visible emissions.  (iii) Condition of bags, including presence of tears, holes, and abrasions. (iv) Presence of dust deposits on clean side of bag.  (v) Brief description of corrective actions taken including date and time. (vi) Daily hours of operation for each control device.  (6) Furnish upon request and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator, all records required under this section. (7) Retain a copy of all monitoring and inspection records for at least2 years. (8) Submit quarterly a copy of the visible emission monitoring recordsto the Administrator if visible emissions occurred during the report period.Quarterly reports shall be postmarked by the 30th day following the endof the calendar quarter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.150 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.148 and Revised] </ITAG>11. Section 61.150 is redesignated as andSection; 61.148 and revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.148 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for insulating materials. </ITAG>No owner or operator of a facility may install or reinstall on a facilitycomponent any insulating materials that contain commercial asbestos ifthe materials are either molded and friable or wet-applied and friableafter drying. The provisions of this paragraph do not apply to spray-appliedinsulating materials regulated under andSection; 61.146.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.151 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.149 and Amended] </ITAG>12. Section 61.151 is redesignated as andSection; 61.149 and is amended byrevising paragraphs (a), (b), (c)(1)(ii) and (iii), and (c)(2), and addingnew paragraphs (d) through (f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.149 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for waste disposal for asbestos mills.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>(a) Deposit all asbestos-containing waste material at a waste disposalsite operated in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 61.154; and (b) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from the transferof control device asbestos waste to the tailings conveyor, or use the methodsspecified by andSection; 61.152 to clean emissions containing particulateasbestos material before they escape to, or are vented to, the outsideair. Dispose of the asbestos waste from control devices in accordance withandSection; 61.150(a) or paragraph (c) of this section; and  (c) * * * (1) * * *  (ii) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from the wettingoperation or use the methods specified by andSection; 61.152 to clean emissionscontaining particulate asbestos material before they escape to, or arevented to, the outside air.  (iii) Wetting may be suspended when the ambient temperature at the wastedisposal site is less then ^9.5 anddegrees;C (15 anddegrees;F), as determinedby an appropriate measurement method with an accuracy of andplusmin;1anddegrees;C(andplusmin;2anddegrees;F). During periods when wetting operations are suspended,temperature must be recorded at least at hourly intervals and records mustbe retained for at least 2 years in a form suitable for inspection.(2) Use an alternative treatment that has received prior approval by theAdministrator. To obtain approval for an alternative treatment, a writtenrequest must be submitted to the Administrator. The Administrator willuse the following criteria to evaluate the alternative treatment method:(i) The ability of the method to control asbestos emissions to levels equivalentto those achieved by currently required methods.(ii) The suitability of the method for the intended application.(iii) The likelihood that the method would contravene other regulations.(iv) The likelihood that the method would result in increased water pollution,land pollution, or occupational hazards.(d) If waste is transported by vehicle to a disposal site:(1) Placard vehicles used to transport asbestos-containing waste materialduring the loading and unloading of waste so that the signs are visible.The placards must:(i) Be posted in such a manner and location that a person can easily readthe legend.(ii) Conform to the requirements for 51 cm andmultiply; 36 cm (20andmin16;andmin16;andmultiply; 14andmin16;andmin16;) upright format signs specified in 29 CFR 1910.145(d)(4)and this paragraph; and(iii) Display the following legend in the lower panel with letter sizesand styles of a visibility at least equal to those specified in this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="15">LEGEND</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASBESTOS DUST HAZARD</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Do Not Remain In Area Unless</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Your Work Requires It</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Breathing Asbestos Dust is Hazardous</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">to Your Health</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Notation</ITAG>2.5 cm (1 inch) Sans Serif, Gothic or Block1.9 cm (\3/4\ inch) Sans Serif, Gothic or Block14 Point Gothic</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Spacing between any two lines must be at least equal to the heightof the upper of the two lines.(2) Provide a copy of the waste shipment record described in paragraph(e)(1) of this section, to the disposal site owner or operator at the sametime as the asbestos-containing waste material arrives at the disposalsite.(e) For all asbestos-containing waste material transported off site:(1) Maintain records, using a form similar to that shown in Figure 4, andinclude the following information:(i) The name, EPA identification number, address, and telephone numberof the waste generator.(ii) The quantity of the asbestos-containing waste material in cubic meters(cubic yards).(iii) The name and telephone number of the disposal site operator.(iv) The name and location of the disposal site.(v) The date transported.(vi) The names, address, and telephone number of the transporter(s).(2) Retain a copy of asbestos waste shipment record for at least 2 years.(3) Maintain records of all waste shipments for which a copy of the wasteshipment record, signed by the owner or operator of the designated disposalsite, is not received within 35 days of the date the waste was acceptedby the initial transporter.(4) Prepare and submit a single copy of a semiannual report to the Administratorand include the following information concerning off-site waste disposalactivities during each consecutive 6-month period:(i) The name, EPA identification number, address, and location of the wastegenerator.(ii) The calendar period covered by the report.(iii) Using a format similar to that shown in Figure 5, a list of all off-sitewaste shipments including the date shipped, the date received by the disposalsite, the quantity of asbestos-containing waste in each shipment (boththe quantity that is friable and that which is nonfriable), the name ofthe disposal facility to which waste was shipped, the name of the transporter,and an indication of whether 35 days or more have elapsed since the wastewas shipped without having received a copy of the waste shipment recordsigned and dated by the disposal site owner or operator.(f) Furnish upon request, and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator, all records required under this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.152 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.150 and Revised]</ITAG>13. Section 61.152 is redesignated as andSection; 61.150 and is revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.150 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for waste disposal for manufacturing, fabricating, demolition,renovation, and spraying operations.</ITAG>Each owner or operator of any source covered under the provisions of andSection;andSection;61.144, 61.145, 61.146, and 61.147 shall comply with the following provisions:(a) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air during the collection,processing (including incineration), packaging, transporting, or depositionof any asbestos-containing waste material generated by the source, or useone of the treatments specified in paragraphs (a) (1) through (4) of thissection. Paragraphs (a) (1), (2), and (4) of this section do not applyto nonfriable materials.(1) Adequately wet asbestos-containing waste material as follows:(i) Mix control device asbestos waste to form a slurry; adequately wetother asbestos-containing waste material; and(ii) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from collection,mixing, wetting, and handling operations, or use the methods specifiedby andSection; 61.152 to clean emissions containing particulate asbestosmaterial before they escape to, or are vented to, the outside air; and(iii) After wetting, seal all asbestos-containing waste material in leak-tightcontainers while wet; or, for materials that will not fit into containerswithout additional breaking, put materials into leak-tight wrapping; and(iv) Label the containers or wrapped materials specified in paragraph (a)(1)(iii)of this section as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">CAUTION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Contains Asbestos</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Avoid Opening or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Breaking Container</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Breathing Asbestos is Hazardous</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">to Your Health</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Alternatively, use warning labels specified by Occupational Safetyand Health Standards of the Department of Labor, Occupational Safety andHealth Administration (OSHA) under 29 CFR 1910.1001(j)(2) or 1926.58(k)(2)(iii).The labels shall be printed in letters of sufficient size and contrastas to be readily visible and legible.(v) Label containers or wrapped materials with the name of the waste generatorand the location at which the waste was generated.(2) Process asbestos-containing waste material into nonfriable forms:(i) Form all asbestos-containing waste material into nonfriable pelletsor other shapes; and(ii) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from collectionand processing operations, including incineration, or use the method specifiedby andSection; 61.152 to clean emissions containing particulate asbestosmaterial before they escape to, or are vented to, the outside air.(3) Broken areas of nonfriable asbestos material that potentially can befurther broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder in the courseof operations regulated by this section must be either adequately wettedusing a wetting agent or encapsulated. If encapsulated, these materialsneed not be sealed in leak-tight containers or wrapping. If adequatelywetted, these materials must be sealed in leak-tight containers or wrapping.(4) For facilities demolished where the asbestos-containing material isnot removed prior to demolition according to andSection; 61.145 (c)(1) (i)and (ii), or for facilities demolished according to andSection; 61.145(c)(9),adequately wet asbestos-containing waste after demolition and while loadingfor transport to disposal site.(5) Use an alternative treatment that has received prior approval by theAdministrator according to the procedure described in andSection; 61.149(c)(2).(b) All asbestos-containing waste material from manufacturing and fabricatingand, for demolition and renovation, all friable and nonfriable asbestos-containingwaste material that potentially can be broken, crumbled, pulverized, orreduced to powder in the course of operations regulated by this sectionmust be deposited as soon as is practical at_(1) A waste disposal site operated in accordance with the provisions ofandSection; 61.154, or(2) A site that converts asbestos-containing material into nonasbestos(asbestos-free) material according to the provisions of andSection; 61.155.(3) The requirements of paragraph (b) of this section do not apply to nonfriablematerials from demolition and renovation operations that normally willnot be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder, such as, packing,gaskets, asphalt roofing, and vinyl floor tile in good condition.(c) When transporting asbestos-containing waste material to a storage ordisposal site:(1) Placard vehicles used to transport asbestos-containing waste materialduring the loading and unloading of waste so that the signs are visible.The placards must conform to the requirements of andSection; 61.149(d)(1)(i), (ii), and, (iii).(2) Provide a copy of the waste shipment record, described in paragraph(d)(1) of this section, to the disposal site owners or operators at thesame time as the asbestos-containing waste material arrives at the disposalsite.(d) For all asbestos-containing waste material including nonfriable materialthat potentially can be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powderin the course of operations regulated by this section:(1) Maintain records, using a form similar to that shown in Figure 4, andinclude the following information:(i) The name, EPA identification number, address, and telephone numberof the waste generator.(ii) The quantity in cubic meters (cubic yards) that is friable and thequantity that is nonfriable.(iii) The name and telephone number of the disposal site operator.(iv) The name and location of the disposal site.(v) The date transported.(vi) The name of the transporter(s).(2) Retain a copy of asbestos waste shipment records for at least two years.(3) Maintain records of all waste shipments for which a copy of the wasteshipment record, signed by the owner or operator of the designated disposalsite, is not received within 35 days of the date the waste was acceptedby the initial transporter.(4) Prepare and submit a single copy of a semiannual report to the Administratorand include the following information concerning waste storage and disposalactivities during each consecutive 6-month period:(i) The name, EPA identification number, address, and location of the wastegenerator.(ii) The calendar period covered by the report.(iii) Using a format similar to that shown in Figure 5, a list of all wasteshipments including the date shipped, the date received by the disposalsite, the quantity of asbestos-containing waste in each shipment (boththe quantity that is friable and that which is nonfriable), the name ofthe disposal facility to which waste was shipped, the name of the transporter,and an indication of whether 35 days or more have elapsed since the wastewas shipped without having received a copy of the waste shipment recordsigned and dated by the storage or disposal site owner or operator.(e) Furnish upon request, and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator, all records required under this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.153</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.151 and Amended]</ITAG>14. Section 61.153 is redesignated as andSection; 61.151 and is amended byrevising the introductory text, paragraphs (a)(2), (a)(4), and (b)(3),and adding paragraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.151</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for inactive waste disposal sites for asbestos mills andmanufacturing and fabricating operations.</ITAG>Each owner or operator of any inactive waste disposal site that was operatedby sources covered under andSection; 61.142, 61,144, or 61.147 and receiveddesposits of asbestos-containing waste material generated by the sources,shall:(a) * * *(1) * * *(2) Cover the asbestos-containing waste material with at least 15 centimeters(6 inches) of compacted nonasbestos-containing material, and grow and maintaina cover of vegetation on the area adequate to prevent exposure of the asbestos-containingwaste material. In desert areas where vegetation would be difficult tomaintain, at least 8 additional centimeters (3 inches) of well-graded,nonasbestos crushed rock may be placed on top of the final cover insteadof vegetation and maintained to prevent emissions; or<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) For inactive waste disposal sites for asbestos tailings, a resinousor petroleum-based dust suppression agent that effectively binds dust tocontrol surface air emissions may be used instead of the methods in paragraphs(a) (1), (2), and (3) of this section. Use the agent in the manner andfrequency recommended for the particular asbestos tailings by the manufacturerof the dust suppression agent to achieve and maintain dust control. Obtainprior approval of the Administrator to use other equally effective dustsuppression agents. For purposes of this paragraph, waste oil is not considereda dust suppression agent.(b) * * *(3) When requesting a determination on whether a natural barrier adequatelydeters public access, supply information enabling the Administrator todetermine whether a fence or a natural barrier adequately access by thegeneral public.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) Obtain the Administrator's approval in writing prior to disturbingany asbestos-containing waste material that has been deposited at a wastedisposal site and is covered. Provide the following information to theAdministrator:(1) Reason for disturbing the waste.(2) Procedures to be used to control emissions.(3) Location of the final disposal site.(e) Within 60 days of a site becoming inactive and after the effectivedate of this subpart, record, in accordance with State law, a notationon the deed to the facility property_or on some other instrument whichis normally examined during a title search_that will in perpetuity notifyany potential purchaser of the property that:(1) The land has been used for the disposal of asbestos-containing wastematerial;(2) The survey plat and record of the location and quantity of asbestos-containingwaste disposed of within the disposal site required in andSection; 61.154(g)have been filed with the Administrator; and(3) The site is subject to 40 CFR Part 61 Subpart M.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.154</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.152 and Amended]</ITAG>15. Section 61.154 is redesignated as andSection; 61.152 and amended by removingparagraph (a)(1)(i), redesignating paragraphs (a)(1)(ii)-(iv) as paragraphs(a)(1)(i)-(iii), redesignating paragraph (b)(2) as paragraph (b)(3), revisingthe introductory text of paragraph (a) and paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(3),and adding paragraphs (a)(3) and (b)(2) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.152</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Air cleaning.</ITAG>(a) The owner or operator who uses air-cleaning, as specified in andSection;andSection;61.142(a), 61.144(b)(2), 61.145(c)(3)(i)(B)(<T3>i</T3>), 61.145(c)(4)(ii), 61.146(b)(2), 61.147(b)(2), 61.149(b), 61.149(c)(1)(ii),61.150(a)(1)(ii), 61.150(a)(2)(ii), and 61.155(e) shall:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) For fabric filter collection devices installed after (the date of proposalof this NESHAP revision), provide for easy inspection for faulty bags.(b) * * *(1) After (the date of proposal of this NESHAP revision), if the use offabric creates a fire or explosion hazard, or the Administrator determinesthat a fabric filter is not feasible, the Administrator may authorize asa substitute the use of wet collectors designed to operate with a unitcontacting energy of at least 9.95 kilopascals (40 inches water gage pressure).(2) Use a HEPA filter that is at least 99.97 percent efficient as determinedby ASTM method D-2986-71.(3) The Administrator may authorize the use of filtering equipment otherthan described in paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1) and (2) of this sectionif the owner or operator demonstrates to the Administrator's satisfactionthat it is equivalent to the described equipment in filtering particulateasbestos material.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.155</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.153 and Amended] </ITAG>16. Section 61.155 is redesignated as andSection; 61.153 and amended by redesignatingparagraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4) as paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5), respectively,revising the introductory text of paragraphs (a), (a)(4), and (a)(5) andparagraphs (a)(2), (a)(4)(ii) and (iii), and (b), and adding paragraph(a)(3) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.153</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting. </ITAG>(a) Any new source to which this subpart applies (with the exception ofroadways, demolition and renovation, spraying and insulating materials),which has an initial startup date preceding the effective date of thisrevision, shall provide the following information to the Administratorwithin 90 days of the effective date. In the case of a new source whichdid not have an initial startup date preceding the effective date, theinformation shall be provided within 90 days of the initial startup date.Any owner or operator of an existing source who provided this informationprior to the effective date is not required to resubmit it. Any changesin the information provided by any existing source shall be provided tothe Administrator within 30 days after the change.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) If a fabric filter device is used to control emissions, (i) The airflow permeability in m\3\/min/m\2\ (ft\3\/min/ft\2\) if thefabric filter device uses a woven fabric, and; if the fabric is synthetic,whether the fill yarn is spun or not spun; and (ii) If the fabric filter device uses a felted fabric, the density in g/m\2\(oz/yd\2\), the minimum thickness in millimeters (inches), and the airflowpermeability in m\3\/min/m\2\ (ft\3\/min/ft\2\). (3) If a HEPA filter is used to control emissions, the efficiency as determinedby ASTM method D-2986-71. (4) For sources subject to andSection;andSection; 61.149 and 61.150:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(ii) The average volume of asbestos-containing waste material disposedof, measured in cubic meters (cubic yards); and (iii) The emission control methods used in all stages of waste disposal;and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(5) For sources subject to andSection; 61.151: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) The information required by paragraph (a) of this section must accompanythe information required by andSection; 61.10. Roadways, demolition and renovation,spraying and insulating materials are exempted from the requirements ofandSection; 61.10(a). The information described in this section must be reportedusing the format of Appendix A of this part as a guide.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.156</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection; 61.154 and Amended] </ITAG>17. Section 61.156 is redesignated as andSection; 61.154 and amended by revisingthe introductory text of andSection; 61.154, paragraphs (c) and (d), andadding paragraphs (e) through (k) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.154</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for active waste disposal sites. </ITAG>Each owner or operator of an active waste disposal site that receives asbestos-containingwaste material under andSection;andSection; 61.149 and 61.150 shall meet therequirements of this section: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) Rather than meet the no visible emission requirement of paragraph (a)of this section, at the end of each operating day, or at least once every24-hour period while the site is in continuous operation, the asbestos-containingwaste material which was deposited at the site during the operating dayor previous 24-hour period shall: (1) Be covered with at least 15 centimeters (6 inches) of compacted nonasbestos-containingmaterial, or (2) Be covered with a resinous or petroleum-based dust suppression agentwhich effectively binds dust and controls wind erosion. Such agent shallbe used in the manner and frequency recommended for the particular dustby the dust suppression agent manufacturer to achieve and maintain dustcontrol. Other equally effective dust suppression agents may be used uponprior approval by the Administrator. For purposes of this paragraph, wasteoil is not considered a dust suppression agent. (d) Rather than meet the no visible emission requirement of paragraph (a)of this section, use an alternative control method for emissions that hasreceived prior approval by the Administrator according to the proceduresdescribed in andSection; 61.149(c)(2). (e) For all asbestos-containing waste material received, the owner or operatorshall: (1) Maintain records, using a form similar to that shown in Figure 4, andinclude the following information: (i) The name, EPA identification number, address, and telephone numberof the waste generator. (ii) The name of the transporter. (iii) the quantity of the asbestos-containing waste material in cubic meters(cubic yards). (iv) The presence of improperly enclosed or uncovered waste, or any asbestos-containingwaste material not sealed in leak-tight containers. (v) The date of receipt. (2) As soon as possible and no longer than 30 days after receipt of thewaste, send a copy of the signed waste shipment record to the generator.(3) Retain a copy of the records required by this paragraph for at leasttwo years. (4) Upon discovering a discrepancy between the quantity of waste designatedon the waste shipment records and the quantity actually received, attemptto reconcile the discrepancy with the waste generator. If the discrepancyis not resolved within 15 days after receiving the waste, immediately reportto the Administrator, describing the discrepancy and attempts to reconcileit and submit a copy of the waste shipment record along with it. (f) The owner or operator of a disposal site shall prepare and submit asingle copy of a semiannual report to the Administrator and include thefollowing information concerning activities during each consecutive 6-monthperiod. (1) The name, address, and location of the disposal site. (2) The calendar period covered by the report. (3) The method of disposal. (4) Using a format similar to that shown in Figure 5, a list of all asbestos-containingwaste shipments including, the date received, the name and EPA identificationnumber of the generator, the date shipped from the generator, the quantityof asbestos-containing waste in each shipment (both the quantity that isfriable and that which is nonfriable), the name of the storage site andtransporter, and the date that a copy of the waste shipment record wassent back to the generator and storage site. (g) Maintain until closure, records of the location, depth and area, andquantity in cubic meters (cubic yards) of asbestos-containing waste materialwithin the disposal site on a map or diagram of the disposal area. (h) Upon closure, comply with all the provisions of andSection; 61.151. (i) Submit to the Administrator, upon closure of the facility, a copy ofrecords of asbestos waste disposal locations and quantities. (j) Furnish upon request and make available during normal business hoursfor inspection by the Administrator all records required under this section.(k) Obtain the Administrator's approval in writing prior to disturbingany asbestos-containing waste material that has been deposited at a wastedisposal site and is covered. Provide the following information to theAdministrator: (1) Reason for disturbing the waste. (2) Procedures to be used to control emissions. (3) Location of the temporary storage and final disposal site. 18. Section 61.155 is added to Subpart M to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.155</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard for operations that convert asbestos-containing waste materialinto nonasbestos (asbestos-free) material. </ITAG>Each owner or operator of an operation that converts asbestos-containingwaste material into nonasbestos (asbestos-free) material shall meet therequirements of this section. (a) Obtain the written approval of the Administrator to construct. To obtainapproval, provide the Administrator with the following information: (1) Application to construct pursuant to andSection; 61.07.(2) In addition to the requirements of andSection; 61.07(b)(3), supply thefollowing process information to the Administrator:(i) Description of waste feed handling and temporary storage.(ii) Description of process operating conditions.(iii) Description of end product handling and temporary storage.(3) Performance test protocol, including provisions for obtaining informationrequired under paragraph (b) of this section.(4) The Administrator may require that a demonstration of the process beperformed prior to approval of the application to construct.(b) Conduct a start-up performance test. Test results shall include:(1) A detailed description of the types and quantities of nonasbestos materialand asbestos-containing wastes processed, e.g., asbestos cement products,friable asbestos insulation, plaster, wood, plastic, wire, etc. Test feedis to include the full range of materials that will be encountered in actualoperation of the process.(2) Results of analyses, using polarized light microscopy, that documentthe asbestos content of the wastes processed.(3) Results of analyses, using transmission electron microscopy, that documentthat the output materials are free of asbestos. Samples for analysis areto be collected as 8-hour composite samples (one 200 gm sample per hour),beginning with the initial introduction of asbestos-containing waste materialand continuing until end of performance test.(4) A description of operating parameters, such as temperature and residencetime, defining the full range over which the process is expected to operateto produce nonasbestos (asbestos-free) materials. Specify the limits foreach operating parameter within which the process will produce nonasbestos(asbestos-free) materials.(5) The length of the test.(c) During the initial 90 days of operation,(1) Continuously monitor and log the operating parameters identified duringstart-up performance tests that are intended to ensure the production ofnonasbestos (asbestos-free) output material.(2) Collect and analyze samples, taken as 10-day composite samples (one200 gm sample collected every 8 hours of operation) of all output materialfor the presence of asbestos. Composite samples may be for fewer than 10days. Transmission electron microscopy shall be used to analyze the outputmaterial for the presence of asbestos. During the initial 90-day periodall output materials must be stored onsite until analysis shows the materialto be asbestos-free or disposed of as asbestos-containing waste materialaccording to andSection; 61.150.(d) After the initial 90 days of operation,(1) Continuously monitor and record the operating parameters identifiedduring start-up performance testing and any subsequent performance testing.Any product produced during a period of deviation from the range of operatingconditions established to ensure the production of nonasbestos (asbestos-free)output materials shall be:(i) Disposed of as asbestos-containing waste material according to andSection;61.150, or(ii) Recycled as waste feed during process operation within the establishedrange of operating conditions, or(iii) Stored temporarily onsite until analyzed for asbestos content. Anyproduct material that is not asbestos-free shall be either disposed ofas asbestos-containing waste material or recycled.(2) Collect and analyze monthly composite samples (one 200 gm sample collectedevery 8 hours of operation) of the output material. Transmission electronmicroscopy shall be used to analyze the output material for the presenceof asbestos.(e) Discharge no visible emissions to the outside air from any part ofthe operation or use the methods specified by andSection; 61.152 to cleanemissions containing particulate asbestos material before they escape to,or are vented to, the outside air.(f) Maintain records and include the following information:(1) Results of start-up performance testing and any subsequent performancetesting including operating parameters, feed characteristics, and analysesof output materials.(2) Results of the composite analyses required during the initial 90 daysof operation under andSection; 61.155(c).(3) Results of the monthly composite analyses required under andSection;61.155(d).(4) Results of continuous monitoring and logs of process operating parametersrequired under andSection; 61.155 (c) and (d).(5) The information on waste shipments received as required in andSection;61.154(e).(6) For output materials where no analyses were performed to determinethe presence of asbestos, record the name and location of the disposalsite to which the output materials were deposited, and the date of disposal.(7) Retain records required by paragraph (f) of this section for at least2 years.(g) Submit the following reports to the Administrator:(1) A report for each analysis of product composite samples performed duringthe initial 90 days of operation.(2) A quarterly report including the following information concerning activitiesduring each consecutive 3-month period:(i) Results of analyses of monthly product composite samples.(ii) A description of any deviation from the operating parameters establishedduring performance testing, the duration of the deviation, and steps takento correct the deviation.(iii) Disposition of any product produced during a period of deviationincluding whether it was recycled, disposed of as asbestos-containing wastematerial, or stored temporarily onsite until analyzed for asbestos content.(iv) The information on waste disposal activities as required in andSection;61.154(f).(h) Nonasbestos (asbestos-free) output material is not subject to any ofthe provisions of this subpart. Output materials in which asbestos is detected,or output materials produced when the operating parameters deviated fromthose established during the start-up performance testing, unless shownby transmission electron microscopy (TEM) analysis to be asbestos free,shall be considered to be asbestos-containing waste and shall be handledand disposed of according to andSection;andSection; 61.150 and 61.154 or reprocessedwhile all of the established operating parameters are being met.19. Section 61.156 is added to Subpart M to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.156 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cross reference to other asbestos regulations.</ITAG>In addition to this subpart, the regulations referenced below also applyto asbestos and may be applicable to those sources specified in andSection;andSection;61.142 through 61.151, 61.154, and 61.155 of this subpart. These crossreferences are presented for the reader's information and to promote compliancewith the cited regulations.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Agency</H1><H1>CFR Citation</H1><H1>Comment</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">EPA<D>40 CFR Part 763, Subpart E</D><D>Requires schools to inspect for asbestos and implement response actionsand submit asbestos management plans to States. Specifies use of accreditedinspectors, air sampling methods, and waste disposal procedures.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> <D>40 CFR Part 427</D><D>Effluent standards for asbestos manufacturing source categories.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> <D>40 CFR Part 763, Subpart G</D><D>Protects public employees performing asbestos abatement work in Statesnot covered by OSHA asbestos standard.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">OSHA<D>29 CFR 1910.1001</D><D>Worker protection measures_engineering controls, worker training, labeling,respiratory protection, bagging of waste, 0.2 f/cc permissible exposurelevel.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> <D>29 CFR 1926.58</D><D>Worker protection measures for all construction work involving asbestos,including demolition and renovation_work practices, worker training, baggingof waste, 0.2 f/cc permissible exposure level.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">MSHA<D>30 CFR Part 56, Subpart D</D><D>Specifies exposure limits, engineering controls and respiratory protectionmeasures for workers in surface mines.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> <D>30 CFR Part 57, Subpart D</D><D>Specifies exposure limits, engineering controls and respiratory protectionmeasures for workers in underground mines.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">DOT<D>49 CFR Parts 171 and 172</D><D>Regulates the transportation of asbestos-containing waste material.Requires waste containment and shipping papers.</D></ITAG></ITAG>20. Section 61.157 is added to Subpart M to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 61.157  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Delegation of authority.  </ITAG>(a) In delegating implementation and enforcement authority to a State underSection 112(d) of the Act, the authorities contained in paragraph (b) ofthis section shall be retained by the Administrator and not transferredto a State.  (b) Authorities which will not be delegated to States:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(1) Section 61.149(c)(2).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(2) Section 61.150(a)(5).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(3) Section 61.151(c).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(4) Section 61.152(b)(3).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(5) Section 61.154(d).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(6) Section 61.155(a).  <ITAG tagnum="84">Figures to Subpart M</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s50,r50,r50,r50,r50,r50  </C><T4>Figure</T4> 1. <T4>Record of Visible Emission Monitoring</T4><H1>Date of inspection (mo/day/yr)</H1><H1>Time of inspection (am/pm)</H1><H1>Control device or fugitive emission source designation or number</H1><H1>Visible emissions observed (yes/no), corrective action taken</H1><H1>Daily operating hours</H1><H1>Inspector's initials</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Figure </T4>2. <T4>Air Pollution Control Device Inspection Checklist</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">1. Control device designation or number  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Date of inspection<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Time of Inspection<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Is control device operating properly (Yes/No)<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Tears, holes, or abrasions in bags (Yes/No)<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Dust on clean side of bags (Yes/No)<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7. Other signs of malfunctions or potential malfunctions (Yes/No)<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D>  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8. Describe other malfunctions or signs of potential malfunctions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9. Describe corrective action(s) taken </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10. Date and time corrective action taken<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D>  </ITAG>11. Inspected by:<ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">(Print/Type Name)        (Title)               (Signature)       (Date)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">(Print/Type Name)        (Title)               (Signature)       (Date)</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Figure 3. Notification of Demolition and Renovation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Name, address, and telephone number of: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(a) Facility owner or operator </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(address) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(phone number) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(person to contact and telephone number) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(b) Asbestos removal contractor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(address) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(phone number) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(person to contact and telephone number) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Type of operation: demolition <T2>XX</T2> renovation <T2>XX</T2> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Description of facility </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) Location </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) Size (square meter [square feet] and number of floors) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(d) Age </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(e) Prior use </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Is asbestos present? yes <T2>XX</T2> no <T2>XX</T2> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Procedure used to detect the presence of asbestos material: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Approximate amount of asbestos that is friable; nonfriable, buthas the potential to be broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder;and nonfriable. Specify amount of asbestos in terms of: linear meters (linearfeet) on pipes; square meters (square feet) for surface area and cubicmeters (cubic feet) for volume on both. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) Friable </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) Nonfriable, but may become broken, crumbled, pulverized, or reducedto powder </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) Nonfriable </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VII. Scheduled dates of asbestos removal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Start </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Completion </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VIII. Scheduled dates of demolition or renovation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Start </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Completion </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IX. Description of planned demolition or renovation work, and method(s)to be used. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">X. Description of work practices and engineering controls to be usedto prevent emissions of asbestos. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(a) At the demolition and renovation site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(b) During storage of the waste </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(c) At the waste disposal site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XI. If you are claiming an exemption from certain requirements ofthe asbestos NESHAP (40 CFR Part 61, subpart M) for all or part of thenonfriable asbestos reported in item VI (b) and (c) above, describe theprocedures to be used to prevent nonfriable material from being broke,crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(a) At the demolition site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(b) At the storage site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(c) At the waste disposal site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XII. Name and location of the waste disposal site </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XIII. If ordered by a government agency, name, title, and authorityof government agency requiring the demolition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date order issued </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date demolition ordered to begin </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XIV. For emergency renovations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) Date and hour that the emergency occurred </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) Description of the sudden unexpected event </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) Explanation of how the event caused unsafe conditions or seriousdisruption of industrial operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XV. Description of procedures to be followed in the event that unexpectedasbestos is found or previously nonfriable asbestos material becomes broke,crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XVI. I certify that the following individual will be on site duringthe demolition or renovation and has been trained in the provisions ofthis regulation (40 CFR Part 61, subpart M) and evidence that the requiredtraining has been accomplished by this person will be available for inspectionduring normal business hours. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(title) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(years with firm) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Signature of owner or operator) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Date) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Figure 4. Asbestos Waste Tracking System </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">1. Work Site Name and Mailing Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Owner's Name </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Owner's Phone No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Owner's Phone No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">2. Operator's Name and Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Operator's Phone No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Operator's US EPA ID No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">3. Waste Disposal Site (WDS) Name and Mailing Address</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">WDS Phone No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">WDS US EPA ID No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">4. Description of Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(d) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(e) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">5. Containers No. and Type</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(d) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(e) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">6. Total Quantity ft\3\ or yd\3\</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(a) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(b) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(c) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(d) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(e) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">7. Special Handling Instructions and Additional Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">8. OPERATOR'S CERTIFICATION: I hereby declare that the contents ofthis consignment are fully and accurately described above by proper shippingname and are classified, packed, marked, and labeled, and are in all respectsin proper condition for transport by highway according to applicable internationaland government regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Printed/Typed Name andamp; Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Signature</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Month  Day  Year  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">9. Transporter 1 (Acknowledgement of Receipt of Materials)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Printed/Typed Name andamp; Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Signature</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Month  Day  Year  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">10. Transporter 2 (Acknowledgement of Receipt of Materials)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Printed/Typed Name andamp; Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Signature</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Month  Day  Year  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">11. Discrepancy Indication Space </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">12. Waste Disposal Site_Owner or Operator: Certification of receiptof asbestos materials covered by this manifest except as noted in item11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Printed/Typed Name andamp; Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Signature</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Month  Day  Year  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">INSTRUCTIONS</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Waste Generator Section (Items 1-8)1. Enter the name of the facility at which asbestos waste is generatedand the address where the facility is located. In the appropriate spacesalso enter the name of the owner of the facility and the owner's phonenumber.2. If a demolition or renovation, enter the name and address of the companyand authorized agent responsible for performing the asbestos removal. Inthe appropriate spaces, also enter the phone number and the US EPA ID Numberof the operator.3. Enter the name and address of the waste disposal site (WDS) which willbe receiving the asbestos materials. In the appropriate spaces also enterthe phone number and US EPA ID Number of the WDS. Enter ``on site'' ifthe waste will be disposed of on the generator's property.4. Indicate the types of asbestos waste materials generated. If from ademolition or renovation, possibilities include, but are not limited to:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Spray-on asbestos insulation from piping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Wrapped asbestos insulation from piping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Spray-on asbestos ceiling/wall insulation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Asbestos ceiling tile</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Asbestos wallboard</ITAG>5. Enter the number of containers used to transport the asbestos materialslisted in item 4. Also enter one of the following container codes usedin transporting each type of asbestos material (specify any other typeof container used if not listed below):<ITAG tagnum="15">DM_Metal drums, barrels</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">DP_Plastic drums, barrels</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">BA_6 mil plastic bags or wrapping</ITAG>6. Enter the friable and nonfriable quantities of each type of asbestosmaterial removed in units of cubic feet (ft \3\) or cubic yards (yd \3\)as appropriate.7. Use this space to indicate special transportation, treatment, storageor disposal or Bill of Lading information. If an alternate waste disposalsite is designated, note it here. Emergency response telephone numbersor similar information may be included here.8. The authorized agent of the operator must read and then sign and datethis certification. The date is the date of receipt by transporter.<ITAG tagnum="21">Note: The operator must retain a copy of this form.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>Transporter Section </T3>(Items 9-10)9. andamp; 10. Enter name of transporter firm, if applicable. Print or typethe full name and title of person accepting responsibility and acknowledgingreceipt of materials as listed on this waste shipment record for transport.Enter date of receipt and signature.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The transporter must retain a copy of this form.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>Disposal Site Section </T3>(Items 11-12)11. The authorized representative of the WDS must note in this space anydiscrepancy between waste described on this manifest and waste actuallyreceived. Any rejected materials should be listed and destination of thosematerials provided. A site that converts asbestos-containing waste materialto nonasbestos material is considered a WDS.12. The signature (by hand) of the authorized WDS agent indicates acceptanceand agreement with statements on this manifest except as noted in item11. The date is the date of signature and receipt of shipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The WDS must retain a completed copy of this form. The WDSmust also send a completed copy to the operator listed in item 2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Figure </T4>5. <T4>Information Required on Individual Waste Shipments for Semiannual Reports</T4><H1>Generator </H1><H2>Name </H2><H2>EPA ID No. </H2><H2>Date shipped </H2><H2>Quantity (ft\3\, yd\3\) </H2><H3>Friable </H3><H3>Nonfriable </H3><H2>Excepted shipment (Yes/No)</H2>b <H1>Name of first transporter </H1><H1>Name of second transporter </H1><H1>Disposal site</H1>a <H2>Name </H2><H2>Date received </H2><H2>Date WSR</H2>c returned to generator  <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><F/><T4>Note:</T4> Indicate ``NA'' if not applicable. <F/>a A site that converts asbestos-containing waste material to nonasbestosmaterial is considered a disposal site. <F/>b Indicate ``yes'' if more than 35 days have elapsed since the wastewas shipped and a signed and dated waste shipment record (WSR) has notbeen returned by the disposal site. <F/>c WSR=Waste Shipment Record.</ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="15">II. In Part 763: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 763_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for 40 CFR Part 763 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 15 U.S.C. 2605 and 2607(c). Subpart E also issued under15 U.S.C. 2641, 2643, 2646, and 2647. </ITAG>2. By adding andSection;763.96 to Subpart E to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;763.96 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disposal. </ITAG>All persons participating in disposal activities affecting friable asbestos-containingmaterial removed from a school building must comply with the provisionsof 40 CFR Part 61, Subpart M_National Emission Standards for Asbestos.If such persons violate any provision of such subpart, it will be a violationof this section also. <ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-494 Filed 1-9-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M  </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>